S.  HRG.  110–1149 

MOVING  PASSENGERS  AND  FREIGHT  INTO  THE 
FUTURE:  A  REVIEW  OF  THE  REPORT  OF  THE 
NATIONAL  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  POLICY 
AND  REVENUE  STUDY  COMMISSION 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

APRIL  22,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–167 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 22, 2008  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Busalacchi,  Hon.  Frank  J.,  Commissioner,  National  Surface  Transportation 
Policy and Revenue Study Commission; Secretary, Department of Transpor-
tation,  State  of  Wisconsin;  and  Chairman,  States  for  Passenger  Rail  Coali-
........................................................................................................................
tion 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Heminger,  Steve,  Commissioner,  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and 
Revenue Study Commission and Executive Director, Metropolitan Transpor-
tation Commission 
...............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Quinn,  Patrick  E.,  Co-Chairman  and  President,  U.S.  Xpress  Enterprises, 
Inc.  and  Commissioner,  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Rev-
enue Study Commission 
......................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Rose,  Matthew  K.,  President  and  CEO,  BNSF  Railway  Company,  and  Com-
missioner, National Surface Transportation Policy and Revenue Study Com-
mission  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schenendorf,  Jack,  Vice  Chair,  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and 
Revenue Study Commission and Of Counsel, Covington & Burling LLP  .......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye  to  Jack 
Schenendorf  ..........................................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1 
3 
1 
5 
3 
3 
38 

13 
15 

20 
22 

34 
36 

26 
30 

6 
8 

53 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

MOVING  PASSENGERS  AND  FREIGHT  INTO 

THE  FUTURE:  A  REVIEW  OF  THE  REPORT  OF 
THE  NATIONAL  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION 
POLICY  AND  REVENUE  STUDY  COMMISSION 

TUESDAY,  APRIL  22,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:36  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Mark  Pryor,  pre-
siding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  The  hearing  will  come  to  order,  and  I  thank  ev-
eryone for being here. We are going to have several Senators come 
today, we think, so I thought what I would go ahead and do is dive 
in with opening statements. I’ll have a few moments on my opening 
statement  and  if  Senator  Stevens  or  his  designee  comes,  we’ll  cer-
tainly  allow  them  to  offer  an  opening  statement,  and  then  we’ll  go 
down the list for our witnesses and give you all 5 minutes. 

And  also,  Mr.  Heminger  has  a  plane  to  catch—is  that  right?  So, 
I’ll  try  to  make  sure  that  whatever  Senators  are  here,  we’ll  try  to 
pummel you with questions first, and then let you get on your way. 
Let  me  go  ahead  and  say  welcome.  I’d  like  to  thank  everybody 
on  the  Committee,  but  certainly  Senator  Inouye  and  Senator  Lau-
tenberg for allowing me to chair this full Committee hearing. 

We’re  here  today  to  talk  about  ‘‘Moving  Passengers  and  Freight 
into the Future.’’ The focus of this hearing will be to review the re-
port  of  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue 
Study Commission, as required under Section 1909 of the Safe, Ac-
countable,  Flexible,  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy 
for  Users,  that  we  call  here  SAFETEA–LU,  and  that’s  what  I’m 
going  to  call  it  from  here  on  out—I’m  not  going  to  go  through  the 
long, proper name of the legislation. 

This hearing will serve as the kickoff for the Commerce Commit-
tee’s  deliberations  on  the  upcoming  reauthorization  of  the  Federal 
surface  transportation  programs.  As  the  Committee  with  jurisdic-
tion  over  the  entire  transportation  system,  it  will  be  particularly 
important  for  us  to  consider  the  impact  of  any  proposed  changes. 
While other Committee’s will be focused on the discrete changes to 
their  portions  of  the  Federal  surface  transportation  program,  we 
have  the  responsibility  of  ensuring  that  the  entire  transportation 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

system—including our aviation, maritime, and surface systems—all 
work together. 

During  the  development  of  SAFETEA–LU,  from  2003  to  2005, 
Congress  became  increasingly  aware  that  the  Nation’s  surface 
transportation  system,  and  the  Federal  programs  that  support  it, 
were  under  significant  stress.  We  had  several  hearings  to  that  ex-
tent,  by  the  way,  during  those  years.  And  increasing  congestion, 
dwindling  capacity,  aging  infrastructure,  persistent  safety  chal-
lenges and declining Federal transportation revenues all pointed to 
a  crisis  ahead.  Recognizing  the  need  to  review  the  current  Federal 
policies, and focusing on the challenge of preserving and expanding 
the  Nation’s  surface  transportation  system  to  meet  the  transpor-
tation  demands  of  the  21st  century,  Congress  established  this 
Study  Commission  to  help  us  work  through  these  issues  in  the  fu-
ture. 

The  purpose  of  the  Commission  was  to  conduct  a  comprehensive 
study of the current and future needs of the Nation’s surface trans-
portation system, and to provide recommendations to inform policy-
makers regarding the future role of the system in supporting a ro-
bust  economy,  accommodating  a  nation’s  growing  population,  and 
maintaining mobility and our existing quality of life. 

Congress  also  asked  the  Commission  to  investigate  mechanisms 
to finance the investments necessary to support this system in the 
future.  Since  its  establishment  in  May  2006,  the  Commission  has 
met  multiple  times  to  hear  about  the  challenges  facing  America’s 
surface transportation network. 

Today,  5  of  the  12  Commissioners  will  testify  about  the  specific 
comments  relating  to  freight  mobility,  highway,  auto  and  truck 
safety,  passenger  and  freight  rail  capacity  and  surface  develop-
ment,  inter-modal  transportation,  and  the  integration  of  our  sur-
face, maritime, and aviation networks. 

Again,  I  want  to  thank  the  Commission  for  your  work,  I  know 
that you have done what the Congress asked you to do, and really 
help  us  look  at  these  issues,  and  we  will  try  to  come  to  terms  and 
listen  to  your  recommendations,  and  today  will  be  the  starting 
point for that. 

I do agree with the Commission’s conclusion that the Nation has 
outgrown  the  current  surface  transportation  system,  that  new  fi-
nancing  options  need  to  be  employed  to  upgrade  and  expand  our 
current system, and that new policy directives and legislative solu-
tions  are  necessary  for  us,  as  a  nation,  to  maintain  and  improve 
our system in the future. 

I  also  share  the  Commission’s  prediction  of  dire  consequences  if 
policymakers  fail  to  take  significant  action.  We  have  already  seen 
the consequences of a persistent, insufficient investment in surface 
transportation,  deterioration  of  surface  transportation  assets,  in-
creased highway casualties, and growing congestion, that affects all 
modes  of  surface  transportation  and  stifles  economic  development. 
As  Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Consumer  Affairs,  I’m 
aware  that  we  need  to  make  sure  that  the  changes  we  make  will 
ensure  the  safety  of  the  traveling  public.  As  we  develop  surface 
transportation  policy  for  the  future,  I  do  not  want  us  to  lose  focus 
on  the 
importance  of  reducing  approximately  43,300  traffic 
deaths—including  over  5,000  truck-related  fatalities—which  occur 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

in  the  United  States  each  year.  Promoting  safe  and  educated  driv-
ing,  improving  road  conditions,  and  increasing  research  and  devel-
opment  for  safety  technologies  and  techniques  are  all  part  of  the 
formula for improving our surface transportation system. 

It’s  my  hope  that  Congress  will  work  in  a  bipartisan  way,  not 
just today, but certainly in the future, as we try to look at our sys-
tem,  and  hopefully  break  free  of  any  political—partisan  polariza-
tion  that  we  might  face  here  in  the  Congress  and  between  the 
branches  of  government.  I  find  the  timing  of  this  hearing  will  be 
critical,  as  we  begin  to  draft  the  next  reauthorization  of  the  High-
way  Bill  in  the  coming  months,  and  the  Committee  continues  its 
current  effort  to  reauthorize  the  rail  safety  programs  and  Amtrak. 
I  very  much  look  forward  to  hearing  testimony  from  the  wit-
nesses,  and  I’ll  have  several  questions,  and  I  know  that  my  col-
leagues will, as well. With that, Senator Hutchison. 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  I  will  defer  to  my  Vice  Chairman,  if  he’s 

ready. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Well, I just would put my statement in full in 

the record, if that’s all right. 

Senator PRYOR. Sure. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank  you,  Senator  Pryor,  for  holding  this  hearing,  and  thank  you,  Commis-

Issues regarding an increase of the gas tax and the role of public-private partner-
ships,  however,  prevented  the  Commissioners  from  reaching  unanimous  rec-
ommendations. 

However,  there  are  areas  of  agreement  among  all  the  Commissioners.  These  rec-
ommendations have the greatest promise of influencing transportation policy in the 
future. 

The  Commissioners  all  recognize  the  importance  of  a  strong,  inter-connected 

transportation system to support our Nation’s economic prosperity and growth. 

To improve our transportation system, it will be necessary to simplify and stream-
line  Federal  transportation  programs  and  funding  categories.  This  will  provide  the 
states  with  more  flexibility  in  how  they  spend  their  transportation  dollars.  Cur-
rently,  it  takes  between  7  and  10  years  to  complete  a  highway  project.  This  is  en-
tirely too long and makes completing projects more expensive. 

I  am  looking  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  today  and  learning  how  we 

can improve our transportation system now. 

Thank you, again, Senator Pryor, for holding this hearing. 

sioners, for joining us today. 

The  Commission  was  established  in  Section  1909  of  SAFETEA–LU  and  was 
charged  by  Congress  with  thoroughly  reviewing  the  Nation’s  programs,  and  with 
preparing a conceptual plan that outlines a long-term transportation vision over the 
next 50 years. 

The  Commission  held  22  hearings  over  20  months  of  study  and  took  testimony 

from over 300 witnesses. 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Well,  thank  you  very  much  for  convening 
this panel, I’m very pleased to hear what the members of the Com-
mission want to say. I have been sort of briefed by my constituent, 
Mr.  Rose,  who  I  think  gave  me  a  good  overview  of  what  you  were 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

looking  at,  and  I  think  that  it  was  important  to  have  this  kind  of 
Commission Report. 

I come from the state that has the largest land mass in the conti-
nental  United  States,  and  the  state  with  the  most  road  miles,  and 
that  means  we  have  vast  agricultural  regions,  but  we  also  have 
some  of  the  fastest-growing  cities  in  our  country,  and  our  produc-
tivity  is  being  stifled  when  we  don’t  have  good  transportation  net-
works. 

The Commission did a good job in laying out the predicament in 
which  we  find  ourselves,  and  the  challenges  that  we  will  face  over 
the next 50 years. It is a sobering report. 

I’m sure that we will begin to address some of these issues in the 
SAFETEA–LU legislation that will come forward next year—or the 
reauthorization of SAFETEA–LU. And while I find some of the so-
lutions  offered  in  the  report  to  be  interesting,  I  do  have  some  sig-
nificant concerns, which are non-starters here in Congress. 

While there may be merit to indexing the Federal Gas Tax, a 25 
cent  or  more  per  gallon  increase  in  the  tax  is  unacceptable.  It  is 
even more unacceptable in Texas where, as a donor State, we fore-
go needed infrastructure improvements every year, by sending mil-
lions  of  gas  dollars  to  other  states.  I  cannot  imagine  a  scenario 
where  a  tax  increase  of  this  magnitude  would  pass  Congress,  par-
ticularly  with  myself  and  other  donor  State  colleagues  supporting 
something that would make our situation of going into a hole, even 
deeper. 

Now  that  the  interstate  highway  system  is  complete,  I  think  it’s 
time for this practice of donating to other States to end. I wish you 
had taken up the issue of whether we still need the gas tax to come 
to  the  Federal  Government  and  be  redisbursed,  inequitably,  to 
some States, and a growth State like mine that is the biggest donor 
State in America, also one of the highest growth States in America, 
is doubly abusive. 

So, I hope that that is dead on arrival here, and I will do every-

thing I can to make sure that it is. 

Additionally,  I  am  concerned  about  the  views  on  tolling,  that 
were  put  forward.  I  do  support  the  right  of  local  communities  to 
build  new  infrastructure  through  tolling.  I  support  tolling  if  it  is 
going  to  create  an  additional  lane,  where  you  keep  the  freeways 
that  are  already  built,  with  the  same  number  of  free  lanes.  I  just 
can’t support the proposals to toll existing lanes. The Federal Gov-
ernment  and  the  States  built  these  roads  using  Federal  funding 
with the commitment that they would remain ‘‘free’’ ways. 

These existing roads are a public good built with public funding, 
and should not be converted to generate money for local entities to 
take  away  from  the  Federal  taxpayers.  So,  I  hope  that  that  is  not 
going to be something that also gets traction. 

I  do  appreciate  the  Commission’s  recognition  that  transit  and 
inter-city  passenger  rail  must  be  part  of  a  solution.  I  am  dis-
appointed that the Commission chose to focus much of its analysis 
of  transit  on  maintaining  the  status  quo  and  not  as  much  on  the 
investments necessary to truly improve and expand America’s tran-
sit  systems.  No  urban  congestion  program  will  work  without  im-
proving the ratio of transit to vehicle trips in a given region. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

I  was  pleased  with  the  focus  on  passenger  rail,  and  a  thorough 
analysis  of  what  it  will  take  to  build  an  extensive  national  pas-
senger  rail  system,  with  the  increased  ridership  necessary  to  sus-
tain  it.  However,  Amtrak  is  not  mentioned,  even  once,  in  the  Re-
port.  It  is  the  lone  national  transportation  provider  supported  by 
the Federal Government, and should be instrumental in the expan-
sion of our passenger rail system. 

So,  I  do  think  it  is  terrific  that  we  had  the  Commission,  with 
some very interesting proposals, and I think the issues are laid out 
very  well.  I  hope  that  we  can  be  a  little  more  creative  about  ad-
dressing some of these issues, and of course, that’s what Congress’ 
responsibility is. 

So, thank you very much. 
Senator PRYOR. Senator Smith? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator SMITH. Mr. Chairman, for the record, Oregon isn’t as big 
as  Alaska  or  Texas,  but  we  still  have  a  lot  of  dirt  between  light 
bulbs up in the eastern parts, where I’m from. 

But, I thank the Chair for holding this important hearing. I also 
want  to  thank  our  witnesses,  all  members  of  the  National  Surface 
Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Commission  who  agreed 
to be here today, and to testify. 

The Commission was charged with an unenviable task of review-
ing our Nation’s transportation policy, and developing a plan to en-
sure that our surface transportation system is able to serve the in-
terests of the United States well into the future. 

It’s clear, however, that our system is barely keeping up with to-
day’s  demands.  It  is  virtually  impossible  to  travel  the  country  and 
not encounter congestion and delays. I’ve seen some estimates that 
put the annual cost of these delays to the U.S. economy as high as 
$78 billion. 

In  the  Pacific  Northwest,  the  bridge  that  connects  Oregon  and 
Washington is the most congested stretch of Interstate 5 outside of 
California.  The  I–5  river  crossing  experiences  crash  rates  nearly 
two  and  a  half  times  the  statewide  average  for  comparable  facili-
ties.  Delays  lasting  two  to  5  hours  are  not  uncommon  during  peak 
hours  of  the  commute  over  the  5-mile  segment  of  the  interstate 
that  includes  this  crossing.  And  by  2030,  congestion  is  expected  to 
grow  to  14  to  16  hours  per  day  on  this  corridor,  as  vehicle  traffic 
over the bridge is expected to increase by more than 40 percent. 

The  Columbia  River  Bridge  needs  to  be  replaced.  This  will  be  a 
massive  project,  costing  millions  of  dollars,  and  taking  years  to 
complete—but  it  needs  to  go  forward.  This  project  is  just  one  of 
many  around  the  country,  aimed  at  easing  the  congestion  that 
threatens to otherwise strangle our economy, and force us to spend 
more time stuck in traffic, and less time with families. 

The  challenge  we  have  is  to  figure  out  how  to  pay  for  these  im-
provements.  The  Highway  Trust  Fund  is  depleted,  and  yet  the 
Commission’s  Report  states  that  we  need  to  more  than  double  our 
annual  transportation  expenditures  in  order  to  return  our  system 
to a state of good repair, and to create the advanced surface trans-
portation infrastructure needed to keep our economy strong. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

The  Commission  has  put  forward  a  number  of  proposals  to  fund 
the construction of our roads, highways and bridges. I look forward 
to hearing more about their ideas to fill the funding gap. 

Finally, I want to commend the Commission for its focus on safe-
ty  in  the  report.  We  lose  40,000  Americans  a  year  to  accidents  on 
our  Nation’s  highways.  We  have  to,  and  we  can,  do  better.  I  ap-
plaud the Commission for setting a goal of halving traffic fatalities 
by  2025.  This  is  an  ambitious  goal,  but  I’m  confident  we  can  get 
there. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  again  for  holding  this  hearing,  and  I 

look forward to hearing from our witnesses. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. And in the interest of time, I’m going 

to greatly abbreviate your introductions. 

First,  let  me  say  that  Senator  Stevens  had  to  slip  out,  there’s  a 
portrait unveiling for Senator Daschle that starts—sometime in the 
next  30  minutes  or  so—and  he  had  to  run  over  there  to  be  part  of 
the  pre-program  for  that.  But  he  said  he  would  submit  his  ques-
tions for the record as well as his statement, so there may be other 
Senators that do the same, without objection. 

Let  me  go  ahead  and  just  introduce  our  first  witness  today.  Mr. 
Jack  Schenendorf,  he’s  the  Commission’s  Vice  Chair,  and  he’s  Of 
Counsel at Covington & Burling. 

Go ahead. 

STATEMENT OF JACK SCHENENDORF, VICE CHAIR, NATIONAL 
SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  POLICY  AND  REVENUE  STUDY 
COMMISSION  AND  OF  COUNSEL,  COVINGTON  &  BURLING 
LLP 
Mr. SCHENENDORF. Thank you, Senator Pryor. 
Let me start by saying it’s a real honor to be here and testifying 
before you, because I started my Congressional career on the House 
Transportation  Committee,  working  for  Congressman  John  Paul 
Hammerschmidt,  and  one  of  the  first  projects  I  worked  on  was 
Highway 71 in northwestern Arkansas, and I learned—not only the 
importance  of  transportation  to  an  area,  but  how  important  that 
was in the national system, with Wal-Mart, and J.B. Hunt and the 
like—and so it was a real educational process. 

I’m  honored  to  be  testifying  today  as  the—in  my  capacity  as  the 
Vice  Chair  of  the  Commission.  In  summarizing  the  Commission’s 
reports, I’d like to make three main points. 

First,  we  have  a  national  transportation  crisis.  Simply  put,  we 
have outgrown our aging surface transportation system. The future 
of  our  Nation’s  well-being,  vitality  and  global  economic  leadership 
is  at  stake.  We  must,  as  a  Nation,  take  significant,  decisive  action 
to create and sustain the preeminent surface transportation system 
in  the  world.  This  is  a  national  problem  that  will  require  strong 
Federal  leadership,  and  we  must  recognize  the  sobering  financial 
reality of such an undertaking. We are recommending that all lev-
els  of  government,  and  the  private  sector,  invest  at  least  $225  bil-
lion  annually  for  the  next  50  years,  to  upgrade  our  existing  trans-
portation  network  to  a  state  of  good  repair,  and  to  build  the  more 
advanced facilities we will require to remain competitive. 

We  are  spending  less  than  40  percent  of  that  amount  today.  We 
cannot  sit  back  and  wait  for  the  next  generation  to  address  these 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

ever-increasing needs—it will be too late. The crisis is now, and we 
have a responsibility and obligation to create a safer, more secure, 
and an ever-more productive system. 

Second, we need fundamental reform. In addition to putting more 
money  into  the  system,  the  Federal  transportation  program  must 
be reformed. We do not believe that the Federal program should be 
reauthorized  in  its  current  form.  Instead,  we  are  calling  for  a  new 
beginning. 

We  believe  that  a  mission  or  sense  of  purpose  must  be  restored 
to  the  Federal  program.  Since  completion  of  the  interstate  system, 
the  program  has  had  no  clear  mission.  It  is  now,  essentially,  a 
block  grant  model,  with  little  or  no  accountability  for  specific  out-
comes. That’s why we are recommending that the 108 existing sur-
face transportation programs, and SAFETEA–LU and existing laws 
be  replaced  with  10  new  Federal  programs  that  are  performance- 
driven,  outcome-based,  generally  mode-neutral,  and  refocused  to 
pursue  objectives  of  genuine  national  interest.  These  programs  in-
clude a State of Good Repair Program, a National Freight Program, 
Safety  Program,  Metropolitan  Congestion  Program,  and  other  pro-
grams that will be discussed in more detail by my colleagues. 

The  way  that  these  programs,  I  might  note,  are  structured,  will 
go  a  long  way  toward  resolving  the  donor/donee  issue,  because  we 
propose  that  the  funding  mechanisms  and  the  distribution  mecha-
nisms be different than they are today, and I believe will go a long 
way toward addressing that problem. 

The  third  point  is  that  if  we  want  a  21st  century  transportation 
system,  we  must  be  willing  to  pay  for  it.  There  is  no  free  lunch 
when it comes to infrastructure investment. Policy changes, though 
necessary,  will  not  be  enough,  on  their  own,  to  produce  the  trans-
portation  system  the  Nation  needs  in  the  21st  century.  We  will 
need a significant increase in public funding to keep America com-
petitive,  we  will  need  additional  private  investment,  we  will  need 
more tolling, and we will need the price for use of the system. Sim-
ply put, we must make use of all of the financial tools available to 
us. 

In  closing,  let  me  just  say  that  one  of  the  things  that  struck  us 
was  our  parents  and  grandparents—about  50  years  ago—gave  us 
a brand-new system in the interstate system that had excess capac-
ity  in  it.  They  also  de-regulated  our  freight  rail  system,  which  al-
lowed  our  freight  rail  system  and  the  excess  capacity  in  it,  along 
with the interstate system to serve our Nation well, and it’s some-
thing  that  we  have  become  used  to,  and  is  part  of  our  fabric,  and 
has  been  part  of  the  reason  that  our  economy  has  been  as  strong 
as it has been. 

But  as  I  mentioned  before—that  system  is  aging,  and  we  have 
outgrown it, both rail and highway systems are congested, we have 
tremendous  growth  coming  in  the  future,  and  it’s—this  generation 
is  going  to  have  to  step  up  to  the  plate  and  do  for  future  genera-
tions, what our grandparents and parents did for us. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Schenendorf follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JACK SCHENENDORF,  VICE CHAIR,  NATIONAL SURFACE 
TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND REVENUE STUDY COMMISSION AND OF COUNSEL, 
COVINGTON & BURLING LLP 
I am Jack Schenendorf. I am Of Counsel with Covington & Burling LLP in Wash-
ington,  D.C.  Prior  to  joining  Covington,  I  served  on  the  Republican  staff  of  the 
House  Transportation  and  Infrastructure  Committee  for  25  years.  I  also  served  on 
the  Bush/Cheney  Transition  where  I  was  Chief  of  the  Transition  Policy  Team  for 
the U.S. Department of Transportation and was responsible for reviewing all trans-
portation policies and issues for the incoming Administration. 

In  2006,  Speaker  Hastert  appointed  me  to  the  National  Surface  Transportation 
Policy  and  Revenue  Commission.  I  was  subsequently  elected  Vice  Chair  by  my  fel-
low Commissioners. It is in that capacity that I am testifying before you today. 

In  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy 
For  Users  (SAFETEA–LU),  Congress  established  the  National  Surface  Transpor-
tation Policy and Revenue Study Commission to undertake a thorough review of the 
Nation’s transportation assets, policies, programs, and revenue mechanisms, and to 
prepare a conceptual plan that would harmonize these elements and outline a coher-
ent,  long-term  transportation  vision  that  would  serve  the  needs  of  the  Nation  and 
its citizens. 

This Commission has worked diligently to fulfill this charge, meeting and holding 
public  hearings  across  the  country  during  the  intensive  20-month  study  period.  On 
behalf of all of the Commissioners, I would like to thank our Chair, Secretary Mary 
Peters,  who  did  an  outstanding  job  in  guiding  us  through  this  effort.  She  presided 
over  the  Commission  with  graciousness,  wisdom,  and  a  great  deal  of  patience.  And 
I  would  be  remiss  if  I  did  not  also  thank  all  of  the  Department  of  Transportation 
staff  assigned  to  the  Commission—especially  Chris  Bonanti,  Lydia  Conrad,  Ross 
Crichton,  Eric  Gabler,  James  March,  David  Marks,  Mary  Moehring,  and  Darren 
Timothy.  Their  professionalism,  expertise  and  dedication  were  instrumental  in  our 
success. And a special thanks goes to our Executive Director, Susan Binder, for her 
hard  work  and  for  the  sound  guidance  and  advice  she  provided  during  our  effort. 
We would not be here today were it not for her and her team. 

Our findings and recommendations—calling for bold changes in policies, programs 
and  institutions—are  contained  in  our  report,  Transportation  for  Tomorrow.  Our 
recommendations  are  the  product  of  a  bipartisan  consensus  of  a  diverse  group  of 
Commissioners—5 appointed by Republican officeholders and 4 appointed by Demo-
cratic  officeholders;  from  both  ends  of  the  political  spectrum  and  everywhere  in  be-
tween; from all regions of the country; a CEO of a company that relies on transpor-
tation  services;  a  CEO  of  a  trucking  company;  a  CEO  of  a  rail  company;  a  state 
transportation  official;  and  a  local  transportation  official.  But  despite  our  different 
perspectives, we were able to coalesce around the findings and recommendations in 
the Commission’s report. 

My  testimony  today  will  focus  on  our  vision  and  our  four  key  recommendations. 

Background 

But first a few key findings: 
• Conditions on America’s surface transportation systems—our roads, bridges and 
highways, our passenger and freight rail facilities, our public transit networks— 
are deteriorating. The physical infrastructure itself is showing the signs of age. 
In  almost  all  cases,  the  operational  efficiency  of  our  key  transportation  assets 
is slipping. 
• In  figures  compiled  by  the  Texas  Transportation  Institute,  congestion  cost  the 
American economy an estimated $78 billion in 2005, measured in terms of wast-
ed fuel and workers’ lost hours. Congestion causes the average peak-period trav-
eler  to  spend  an  extra  38  hours  of  travel  time  and  consume  an  additional  26 
gallons of fuel. 
• Over  the  next  50  years,  the  population  of  the  United  States  will  grow  by  some 
120  million  people,  greatly  intensifying  the  demand  for  transportation  services 
by private individuals and by businesses. Most of that growth will occur in met-
ropolitan  areas.  Congestion  will  increase  and  spread  beyond  the  traditional 
morning and evening rush hours to affect ever-lengthening periods of each day. 
• If, as expected, the world economy grows and becomes more globally integrated 
during the next half-century, the U.S. will experience higher trade volumes and 
greater  pressures  on  its  international  gateways  and  domestic  freight  distribu-
tion  network.  Economic  forecasts  indicate  that  freight  volumes  will  be  70  per-
cent  higher  in  2020  than  they  were  in  1998.  Without  improvements  to  key 
goods-movement networks, freight transportation will become increasingly inef-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

ficient and unreliable, hampering the ability of American businesses to compete 
in the global marketplace. 

• Travel  on  the  Nation’s  surface  transportation  system  is  far  too  dangerous.  In 
2006, over 42,000 people lost their lives on American highways, and almost 2.6 
million were injured. 

• Overly  onerous  and  procedure-bound  environmental  review  processes  can  often 
serve  to  delay  the  speedy  and  cost-conscious  delivery  of  important  transpor-
tation  improvements.  Major  highway  projects  take  about  13  years  from  project 
initiation to completion, according to the Federal Highway Administration, and 
Federal  Transit  Administration  figures  indicate  that  the  average  project-devel-
opment period for New Starts projects is in excess of 10 years. 

Our Vision 

Just  as  it  helps  to  know  your  destination  before  starting  off  on  a  trip,  our  Com-
mission believed at the outset that it is important to have in mind a vision of what 
the  national  surface  transportation  system  might  look  like—or  at  least  how  we’d 
like it to function—in the middle of the 21st century. 

We  decided  to  aim  high.  We  agreed  among  ourselves  that  our  fundamental  moti-
vation  should  be  to  help  the  United  States  to  ‘‘create  and  sustain  the  pre-eminent 
surface transportation in the world.’’ That pledge has in the end allowed us to reach 
agreement on a surprisingly wide range of sweeping policy proposals. 
Four Key Recommendations 

The Commission respectfully makes the following key recommendations: 
First,  to  keep  America  competitive,  we  are  recommending  a  significant  increase  in 

investment in our national surface transportation system. 

Any  effort  to  address  the  future  transportation  needs  of  the  United  States  must 
come  to  grips  with  the  sobering  financial  reality  of  such  an  undertaking.  We  esti-
mate  that  the  U.S.  needs  to  invest  at  least  $225  billion  annually  for  the  next  50 
years  to  upgrade  our  existing  transportation  network  to  a  good  state  of  repair  and 
to build the more advanced facilities we will require to remain competitive. We are 
spending less than 40 percent of this amount today. 

The  existence  of  an  enormous  investment  gap  is  indisputable.  It  has  been  docu-
mented by study after study, including most recently the Urban Land Institute’s In-
frastructure  2007  Report,  DOT’s  own  Conditions  and  Needs  Report,  and  various 
state  studies.  It  has  been  documented  by  our  Commission’s  analyses.  It  has  been 
documented  by  the  many  witnesses  we  heard  from  in  our  hearings.  And  it  is  being 
documented  every  day  by  the  American  people  as  they  sit  in  congestion  on  crum-
bling roads or ride on crowded and aging buses and trains. 

The  implications  of  this  underinvestment,  which  has  been  going  on  for  decades, 
are ominous. We saw with Katrina what happens when there is a pattern of under-
investment in infrastructure. Unless we close this investment gap soon, our surface 
transportation systems will face the same fate as New Orleans’ levees. We must not 
let this happen. 

To close this investment gap, we will need increased public funding. We will also 
need  increased  private  investment.  More  tolling  will  need  to  be  implemented  and 
new  and  innovative  ways  of  funding  our  future  system  will  need  to  be  employed. 
And  we  will  need  to  price  for  the  use  of  our  system,  which  will  help  reduce  invest-
ment needs. 

Second, we are recommending that the Federal Government be a full partner—with 
states,  local  governments  and  the  private  sector—in  addressing  this  looming  trans-
portation crisis. 

The  problem  is  simply  too  big  for  the  states  and  local  governments  to  handle  by 
themselves,  even  with  the  help  of  the  private  sector.  We  believe  that  the  Federal 
Government  must  continue  to  be  part  of  the  solution,  both  in  terms  of  providing 
leadership and in terms of providing a fair share of the resources. 

And  it’s  not  just  that  the  problem  is  big.  The  Federal  Government  has  a  strong 
interest in our national transportation system. The system is of vital importance to 
our  economy,  our  national  defense  and  our  emergency  preparedness.  Our  transpor-
tation  network  is  critical  to  the  interstate  and  regional  movement  of  people  and 
goods, economic growth, global competitiveness, environmental sustainability, safety 
and our overall quality of life. 

Third, we are recommending fundamental and wide-ranging reform of the Federal 
transportation program. We are recommending that the program be transformed into 
one  that  is  performance-driven,  outcome-based,  generally  mode-neutral,  and  re-
focused to pursue objectives of genuine national interest. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

In  addition  to  putting  more  money  into  the  system,  the  Federal  transportation 
program  must  be  reformed.  We  do  not  believe  that  the  Federal  program  should  be 
reauthorized in its current form. Instead, we are calling for A New Beginning. 

No  more  restrictive  categories.  No  more  planning  silos.  Generally  no  more  modal 

silos. And no more earmarks. 

There are three key elements to this recommendation. 
Element  One:  We  believe  that  a  mission  or  sense  of  purpose  must  be  restored  to 
the  Federal  program.  Since  completion  of  the  Interstate  System,  the  program  has 
had no clear mission. It is now essentially a block grant model, with little or no ac-
countability for specific outcomes. We believe that this must change. 

We are recommending that the program be transformed into one that is perform-
ance-driven,  outcome-based,  free  of  earmarking,  generally  mode-neutral,  and  re-
focused  to  pursue  objectives  of  genuine  national  interest.  More  specifically,  we  are 
recommending that the 108 existing surface transportation programs in SAFETEA– 
LU  and  related  laws  should  be  replaced  with  the  following  new  Federal  programs: 
• A program designed to bring our existing highways, bridges and transit systems 

into a state-of-good-repair; 

• A freight program designed to enhance U.S. global competitiveness; 
• A program designed to reduce congestion in our largest metropolitan areas (pop-

ulation greater than one million) (e.g., reduction of 20 percent by 2025); 

• A  program  designed  to  improve  access  and  mobility  in  smaller  cities  and  rural 

• A  program  designed  to  improve  safety  by  cutting  fatalities  (e.g.,  by  50  percent 

• A program designed to provide high speed passenger rail service in the Nation’s 

high-growth corridors (300–500 miles); 

• A program designed for environmental stewardship; 
• An energy security program designed to hasten the development of replacement 

areas; 

by 2025); 

fuels; 

• A Federal lands program; and 
• A coherent national research and development program. 
These programs would give rise to a national surface transportation strategic plan 

that would guide Federal investment. 

U.S. DOT, state and regional officials, and other stakeholders would establish per-
formance  standards  in  the  Federal  program  areas  outlined  above  and  develop  de-
tailed plans to achieve those standards. Detailed cost estimates would also be devel-
oped.  These  plans  would  then  be  assembled  into  a  national  surface  transportation 
strategic plan. 

Federal investment would be directed by the national surface transportation stra-
tegic  plan.  Only  projects  called  for  in  the  plans  would  be  eligible  for  Federal  fund-
ing.  And  all  levels  of  government  would  be  accountable  to  the  public  for  achieving 
the results promised. 

The  Commission  acknowledges  that  this  element  of  the  recommendation  rep-
resents a major departure from current law. Developing performance standards and 
integrating  them  into  a  performance-driven  regimen  will  be  challenging  but  we  be-
lieve the rewards will be worth the effort. In addition to making better use of public 
monies  to  accomplish  critical  national  objectives,  the  Commission’s  recommended 
approach of performance standards and economic justification would do much to re-
store public confidence in the transportation decision-making process. In such an en-
vironment, we believe Congress and the public would be more amenable to funding 
the Nation’s transportation investment needs. 

Element Two: The project delivery process must be reformed by retaining all cur-
rent  environmental  safeguards,  but  significantly  shortening  the  time  it  takes  to 
complete reviews and obtain permits. Projects must be designed, approved and built 
as  quickly  as  possible  if  we  are  to  meet  the  transportation  challenges  of  the  21st 
Century. This will save both time and money. 

Element  Three:  We  are  recommending  that  Congress  establish  an  independent 
National  Surface  Transportation  Commission  (NASTRAC),  modeled  after  aspects  of 
the Postal Regulatory Commission, the Base Closure and Realignment Commission, 
and  state  public  utility  commissions.  The  new  Federal  commission  would  perform 
two principal planning and financial functions: 

• The  NASTRAC  would  oversee  various  aspects  of  the  development  of  the  per-
formance-based  performance  standards  in  the  Federal  program  areas  outlined 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

above  and  the  detailed  plans  to  achieve  those  standards,  and  it  would  approve 
the national transportation strategic plan. 
• Once  the  national  strategic  plan  has  been  approved,  the  NASTRAC  would  es-
tablish  a  Federal  share  to  finance  the  plan  and  recommend  an  increase  in  the 
Federal fuel tax to fund that share, subject to congressional veto. 

And fourth, to close the investment gap, we are recommending a wide range of rev-

enue enhancements. 

Unfortunately, there is no free lunch when it comes to infrastructure investment. 
Policy  changes,  though  necessary,  will  not  be  enough  on  their  own  to  produce  the 
transportation system the Nation needs in the 21st century. Significant new funding 
also will be needed. 

We are recommending significant changes in the way the program is financed. In 
the  long-term,  we  envision  transitioning  from  motor  fuel  taxes  to  a  VMT  tax;  we 
include  in  our  recommendations  a  number  of  provisions  to  hasten  that  transition. 
And in the interim, we would no longer rely almost exclusively on motor fuel taxes; 
instead, we would rely on a broad range of user-related fees and charges. 

Here are our major revenue recommendations: 
General Revenue Recommendations: We are making the following general revenue 

recommendations: 

• It  is  imperative  that  all  levels  of  government  and  the  private  sector  contribute 
their appropriate shares if the United States is to have the pre-eminent surface 
transportation system in the world. 
• We  strongly  support  the  principle  of  user  financing  that  has  been  at  the  core 
• We  are  recommending  continuation  of  the  budgetary  protections  for  the  High-
way  Trust  Fund,  so  that  user  fees  benefit  the  people  and  industries  that  pay 
them. 

of the Nation’s transportation funding system for half a century. 

Immediate  Revenue  Recommendations:  We  recommend  that  legislation  be  passed 
in  2008  to  keep  the  Highway  Account  of  the  Highway  Trust  Fund  solvent  and  pre-
vent  highway  investment  from  falling  below  the  levels  guaranteed  in  SAFETEA– 
LU. 

Mid-Term  Revenue  Recommendations:  We  are  making  the  following  specific  rec-
ommendations  with  respect  to  transportation  funding  in  the  period  between  2010 
and 2025: 

• The  annual  investment  requirement  to  improve  the  condition  and  performance 
of  all  modes  of  surface  transportation—highway,  bridge,  public  transit,  freight 
rail  and  intercity  passenger  rail—ranges  between  $225–340  billion.  The  range 
depends upon the extent of peak-hour pricing implemented on congested urban 
highways in lieu of physical capacity expansion. To address this investment tar-
get  by  providing  the  traditional  Federal  share  of  40  percent  of  total  transpor-
tation  capital  funding,  the  Federal  fuel  tax  needs  to  be  raised  by  25–40  cents 
per  gallon.  This  increase  should  be  phased  in  over  a  period  of  5  years  (5  to  8 
cents per gallon per year). This rate increase should be indexed to the construc-
tion cost index. 
• We  are  also  recommending  other  Federal  user-based  fees  to  help  address  the 
funding  shortfall,  such  as  a  freight  fee  for  goods  movement  projects,  dedication 
of  a  portion  of  existing  customs  duties,  and  ticket  taxes  for  passenger  rail  im-
provements. Tax and regulatory policy also can play an incentivizing role in ex-
panding freight and intermodal networks. 
• In addition, we are recommending that Congress remove certain barriers to toll-
ing  and  congestion  pricing,  under  conditions  that  protect  the  public  interest. 
This  will  give  states  and  local  governments  that  wish  to  make  greater  use  of 
tolling  and  pricing  the  flexibility  to  do  so.  More  specifically,  we  are  recom-
mending  that  Congress  modify  the  current  Federal  prohibition  against  tolling 
on the Interstate System to allow: 
» tolling to fund new capacity on the Interstate System, as well as the flexibility 

to price the new capacity to manage its performance; and 

» congestion  pricing  on  the  Interstate  System  (both  new  and  existing  capacity) 

in metropolitan areas with populations greater than 1 million. 

• We  are  recommending  that  Congress  encourage  the  use  of  public-private  part-
nerships,  including  concessions,  for  highways  and  other  surface  transportation 
modes.  Public-private  partnerships  can  serve  as  a  means  of  attracting  addi-
tional  private  investment  to  the  surface  transportation  system,  provided  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

conditions are included to protect the public interest and the movement of inter-
state commerce. 
• State  and  local  governments  have  many  different  types  of  revenues  to  draw 
upon for their share of new investment. The Commission expects that state and 
local governments will have to raise motor fuel, motor vehicle, and other related 
user fees. In addition, many may take advantage of the expanded opportunities 
in  tolling,  congestion  pricing  and  public-private  partnerships  that  our  rec-
ommendations propose. 

Long-Term  Revenue  Recommendations:  We  are  making  the  following  specific  rec-

ommendations for transportation funding in the post–2025 era: 

• The motor fuel tax continues to be a viable revenue source for surface transpor-
tation  at  least  through  2025.  Thereafter,  the  most  promising  alternative  rev-
enue  measure  appears  to  be  a  vehicle  miles  traveled  (VMT)  fee,  provided  that 
substantial privacy and collection cost issues can be addressed. The next surface 
transportation  authorization  act  should  require  a  major  national  study  to  de-
velop  the  specific  mechanisms  and  strategies  for  transitioning  to  the  VMT  fee 
or another alternative to the motor fuel tax to fund surface transportation pro-
grams. 

A Failure To Act Would Be Devastating 

The surface transportation system of the United States is at a crossroads. The fu-
ture  of  our  Nation’s  well  being,  vitality  and  global  economic  leadership  is  at  stake. 
We must take significant, decisive action now to create and sustain the pre-eminent 
surface transportation system in the world. 

But  some  will  question  whether  it  is  realistic  to  think  that  Congress  will  raise 
the  gas  tax  by  25  to  40  cents  per  gallon  over  5  years,  given  the  current  anti-tax 
increase sentiment in some quarters. The Commission’s recommendation is based on 
our  best  judgment  on  what  needs  to  be  done  to  address  our  investment  shortfall, 
without factoring in the political feasibility. 

But it doesn’t seem unreasonable to think that the public would be willing to sup-
port  an  increase  of  this  magnitude  to  finance  a  reformed  program  that  has  a  clear 
mission  and  is  focused  on  projects  in  the  national  interest.  In  year  five,  the  cost  to 
the  average  motorist  would  be  41  cents  to  66  cents  per  day—less  than  the  price  of 
a  candy  bar  or  about  1⁄5 the  cost  of  a  cafe  latte.  This  seems  like  a  bargain  when 
you  consider  that  he  or  she  will  get  for  it:  substantially  reduced  fatalities,  highway 
and  transit  systems  in  a  state  of  good  repair,  reduced  congestion,  a  transportation 
system that can support a strong economy and job growth, and access for all Ameri-
cans  to  all  parts  of  our  Nation.  Moreover,  forty-one  or  sixty-six  cents  a  day  also 
seems  quite  reasonable  when  you  compare  it  to  the  projected  $5  to  $6  average  per 
trip  cost  of  using  a  14-mile  stretch  of  the  Capital  Beltway  during  rush  hour—a 
project which some have called a ‘‘national model.’’ 

But even more compelling is that a failure to act—that is, a failure to raise suffi-

cient revenue to close the investment gap—would be devastating. 

The  United  States  would  be  unable  to  compete  effectively  in  the  global  market-
place.  Our  status  as  an  economic  superpower  would  be  jeopardized.  Jobs  would  be 
lost. And as U.S. businesses are squeezed by foreign competitors, those jobs that re-
main would likely be lower paying. 

Moreover,  our  quality  of  life  would  suffer  substantially.  We  would  have  fewer 
travel  options.  We  would  spend  more  time  in  congestion.  We  would  have  to  leave 
our  families  earlier  in  the  morning  and  arrive  home  later  at  night.  Going  to  and 
from  the  doctor  would  be  more  difficult  as  congestion  extends  to  more  and  more 
roads  and  for  longer  and  longer  periods  of  time.  Other  errands  and  trips  to  school 
would  be  similarly  affected.  And  as  gridlock  became  common  even  in  rural  areas, 
vacations  would  become  a  nightmare.  And  the  cost  of  maintaining  our  vehicles 
would increase as they are damaged by our crumbling infrastructure. 

Eventually  we  would  reach  the  point  of  catastrophic  failures.  Road  closures. 
Bridge collapses. Long detours. Tragedies like the I–35 Bridge collapse in Minnesota 
would become all too common. 

Fatalities and injuries would continue increasing and could reach alarming rates. 
We cannot let this happen. We must find the political leadership and the political 
will to make the necessary reforms and the necessary investment. Raising revenues 
will not be easy. But we must do it, and we must do it soon. 
A Call To Action 

President  Dwight  D.  Eisenhower  had  the  foresight  to  understand  how  a  system 
of interstate highways would transform the Nation. If there was ever a time to take 
a  similarly  daring  look  at  a  broadened  surface  transportation  network,  it  is  now. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

The  nation  faces  challenges  similar  to  those  of  the  Eisenhower  era.  However,  the 
imperative for change due to the global economy is even stronger. 

The  good  news  is  that  we  can  do  it.  We  believe  that  our  recommendations,  if  en-
acted  as  a  package,  will  give  the  American  people  the  transportation  system  they 
need  and  deserve.  We  cannot  just  reform  our  way  out  of  the  transportation  crisis; 
nor can we get the job done by sending lots more money coursing through a broken 
project delivery system. We need both reform and increased investment. 

We cannot sit back and wait for the next generation to address these ever-increas-
ing  needs.  It  will  be  too  late.  The  crisis  is  now  and  we  have  a  responsibility  and 
obligation to create a safer, more secure, and ever more productive system. We need 
to  create  and  sustain  the  pre-eminent  surface  transportation  system  in  the  world. 
Now. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Next we’ll have the Honorable Frank Busalacchi, he’s a Commis-
sion member, but he’s also Secretary of the Wisconsin Department 
of Transportation. 
STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK J. BUSALACCHI, COMMISSIONER, 

NATIONAL SURFACE TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND 

REVIEW STUDY COMMISSION; SECRETARY, DEPARTMENT 

OF TRANSPORTATION, STATE OF WISCONSIN AND CHAIRMAN, 

STATES FOR PASSENGER RAIL COALITION 

Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Pryor,  Members  of 
the  Committee,  my  name  is  Frank  Busalacchi,  I  am  Secretary  of 
the Wisconsin Department of Transportation, and also the Chair of 
the States for Passenger Rail Coalition. 

As a State DOT Secretary, I see firsthand how transportation af-
fects  our  citizens  lives.  Serving  on  the  Commission  allowed  me  to 
consider  how  Federal  policy  could  be  crafted  to  best  serve  citizens 
nationwide,  and  to  assure  that  States  worked  together  to  achieve 
national goals. 

Commissioners  came  to  the  table  with  perspectives  from  every 
conceivable  viewpoint.  We  held  10  public  hearings  across  the  Na-
tion. We spent 3 days together at a retreat in 2007. We had many 
long  and  difficult  conversations,  but  we  came  together  to  support 
the report before you, because we recognize our charge is critically 
important to the Nation. 

We started with needs. The Commission analyzed information to 
project  the  Nation’s  transportation  needs  over  the  next  50  years. 
For highways and transit systems, this exercise was easier than for 
rail.  U.S.  DOT  has  been  collecting  highway  and  transit  data  for 
many years. For freight and passenger rail, the Commission relied 
on  Commissioner  Rose  and  me  to  compile  needs  information.  I  en-
gaged a working group to provide an inter-city passenger rail anal-
ysis. 

The group mapped the vision of the national rail system in 2050, 
and  determined  cost  estimates  to  achieve  that  vision.  Its  focus  is 
city-to-city connections in corridors of 500 miles or less. 

The 2050 map is illustrative only, as individual states will be re-
sponsible for their own rail plans. Many States are already working 
on  estimates  and  plans  for  new  passenger  rail  service.  With  Fed-
eral  support,  these  States  will  be  empowered  to  implement  their 
rail plans. 

For the past 50 years, we have not adequately supported our pas-
senger  rail  system.  In  response  to  testimony  from  State  and  local 
officials  asking  for  additional  public  investment  in  rail,  the  Com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

mission adopted inter-city passenger rail, as part of its multi-modal 
vision for the future. 

Of  the  10  new  programs  recommended,  inter-city  passenger  rail 
is  the  only  modally  focused  program.  The  Federal  Government 
would fund 80 percent of the program, similar to the funding part-
nership for highways, transit, and aviation. 

We must create a healthy, vibrant passenger and freight rail sys-
tem  that  moves  people  and  freight.  Rail  has  the  added  benefit  of 
reducing  carbon  dioxide,  and  other  emissions  per  passenger  mile, 
compared with highway and air travel. 

Gas  prices  are  reaching  $4  a  gallon,  and  people  are  moving  to 
trains.  Amtrak  is  consistently  reporting  more  riders  on  its  trains, 
most  recently  reporting  ridership  increases  of  11  percent  on  State 
corridor trains. 

The Senate understands the importance of inter-city rail, having 
twice  approved  the  provisions  of  S.  294,  authorizing  a  grant  pro-
gram for States to implement passenger rail service. 

We  need  action  now.  Without  a  Federal  funding  partner,  states 
will not be able to build passenger rail systems to accommodate the 
increasing  demand  from  our  citizens.  When  Commissioners  came 
together,  they  quickly  recognized  the  problems  of  a  limited  pas-
senger  rail  system.  Lack  of  transportation  options  in  some  cities, 
inadequate  freight  capacity,  and  traffic  congestion  in  our  urban 
areas. 

There  were  strong  voices,  as  well,  for  transportation  challenges 
of  rural  America.  Our  transportation  system  is  a  network  that 
passes through urban, suburban, and rural areas. Rural states gen-
erally  have  higher  lane  miles,  and  fewer  people  to  support  the  up-
keep  of  their  roads.  They  have  limited  transit  services,  and  inad-
equate  vehicle  miles  traveled  to  support  a  privately  managed  toll 
system. 

Connecting  America—a  national  program  for  smaller  cities  and 
rural  areas—assures  that  states  with  rural  populations  will  con-
tinue to receive Federal transportation funds. All states, regardless 
of  their  population  density,  geographical  size  or  economic  status, 
depend  on  their  transportation  systems  for  their  economic  vitality, 
and  quality  of  life.  Without  a  Federal  commitment  to  a  program 
like  Connecting  America,  between  20  and  25  States  will  miss  out 
on the benefits of improved transportation. 

Once the Commission identified the needs, we considered options 
for  funding  our  multi-modal  vision.  For  50  years,  the  Highway 
Trust  Fund  has  been  the  primary  mechanism  for  funding  our 
transportation  system.  But  its  revenues  have  not  been  raised  in 
over 15 years, nor has the fund been indexed, to protect it from in-
flation. 

Commissioners are concerned that the cash balance in the High-
way  Account  of  the  Highway  Trust  Fund  may  fall  to  a  negative 
$1.4 billion by the year 2009. 

I’m  troubled  by  the  President’s  2009  budget  proposal,  and  the 
lack of a long-term solution to assure the growth and predictability 
of future revenues. If Congress does not address this revenue short-
fall  in  the  Highway  Trust  Fund,  my  state’s  funding—assuming  no 
corrective action, will drop by nearly $100 million in the year 2009. 
All States will be similarly affected. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

We  spoke  plenty  in  our  Commission  Report—there  is  no  free 
lunch  when  it  comes  to  financing.  We  recommend  a  variety  of  rev-
enue  sources,  and  we  came  down  squarely  on  the  side  of  ‘‘pay  as 
you go’’ financing. 

The  Commission  looked  at  long-term  leases  by  private  invest-
ment companies used to build interstate tolling projects. Our roads 
and transit systems are public assets, and should be protected. We 
should not allow private companies to take their profits from infra-
structure built with public funds. 

The current issues plaguing Wall Street and our economy, speak 
to  this  issue.  The  government  must  assure  that  the  public  is  not 
assuming  the  risk  of  private  sector  investment  decisions.  It  was  a 
bold  vision,  and  strong  commitment  to  fund  the  Interstate  that 
made it possible 50 years ago. Now, our highway and aviation sys-
tems are congested, and it’s time to create a truly multi-modal sys-
tem. 

It will take a strong Federal partner to help finance the Commis-
sion’s vision for the preeminent transportation system in the world. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Busalacchi follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON.  FRANK J.  BUSALACCHI,  COMMISSIONER,  NATIONAL 
SURFACE TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND REVENUE STUDY COMMISSION; SECRETARY, 
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION,  STATE OF WISCONSIN AND CHAIRMAN,  STATES 
FOR PASSENGER RAIL COALITION 
Good afternoon, Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, Members of the Com-
mittee. My name is Frank Busalacchi. I am Secretary of the Wisconsin Department 
of Transportation and Chairman of the 31-member States for Passenger Rail Coali-
tion. It is a distinct pleasure to appear before your Committee today with colleagues 
from  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Commission 
(the Commission). 

As a state DOT Secretary, I see firsthand how transportation affects our citizens’ 
lives.  Serving  on  the  Commission  offered  me  the  opportunity  to  consider  how  Fed-
eral  policy  could  be  crafted  to  best  serve  citizens  nationwide—and  to  assure  that 
states  work  in  concert  to  achieve  national  goals.  I  am  honored  that  Speaker  Nancy 
Pelosi  appointed  me  to  serve  as  a  member  of  this  Commission,  and  I  am  proud  of 
our accomplishments. 
The Commission’s Vision—Needs and the Federal Role 

The  Commission  delivered  its  report  to  Congress  in  December  2007.  That  report 
is  supported  by  a  bipartisan  group  of  Commissioners  who  came  together  to  chart 
a  course  for  the  Nation’s  transportation  system  over  the  next  50  years.  To  do  this, 
we began with the end in mind. Early in our work, we created a vision that we be-
lieved should drive our Nation’s transportation policy—to create and sustain the pre-
eminent transportation system in the world. 

Commissioners  came  to  the  table  with  perspectives  from  every  conceivable  view-
point.  We  held  ten  public  hearings  across  the  Nation.  We  spent  3  days  together  at 
a retreat in August 2007. We had many long and difficult conversations. In the end, 
we came together to support the report before you because we recognized our charge 
was  critically  important  to  the  Nation.  We  also  recognized  that  if  we  did  not  come 
together  as  Democratic,  Republican,  public  sector  and  private  sector  members,  we 
could not look Members of Congress in the eye and ask them to come together over 
the critical issue of transportation policy. 

We  started  with  needs.  The  Commission  gathered  and  analyzed  information  to 
project the Nation’s transportation needs over the next 50 years. For highways and 
transit systems, this exercise was somewhat easier than for rail. We had the benefit 
of  highway  and  transit  data  collected  by  U.S.  DOT  over  many  years.  For  both 
freight  and  passenger  rail,  the  Commission  relied  on  Commissioner  Matt  Rose  and 
me to oversee the collection of needs data. For all surface transportation, the needs 
are  staggering—a  minimum  of  $225  billion  each  year,  potentially  as  much  as  $338 
billion. Counting all levels of government, our Nation currently spends less than $90 
billion each year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

While  sobering,  these  dollar  figures  gave  us  a  firm  foundation  for  the  remainder 
of  the  Commission’s  work  and,  specifically,  our  next  task—determining  the  Federal 
role.  Again,  my  role  as  Wisconsin  DOT  Secretary  informed  my  view  of  this  issue. 
From  a  parochial  perspective,  Wisconsin  DOT  works  to  provide  the  best  transpor-
tation  value  to  the  citizens  of  Wisconsin.  At  the  same  time,  investments  made  in 
the  Chicago  metropolitan  area  and  in  other  areas  around  the  country  directly  im-
pact upon Wisconsin’s transportation system. The important point here is that with-
out a strong Federal vision supported by Federal policy and funding, the states will 
always act in their self-interest. 

The Commission spent a morning with representatives of the ‘‘Big Seven’’ organi-
zations 1 last  May,  and  the  testimony  of  these  organizations  drove  that  point  home 
to me. They told the Commission that only the Federal Government has the ability 
to  move  policy  in  big,  national  ways.  Each  state  or  city  can  work  to  be  innovative, 
but national coordination, supported by funding, must come from the Federal level. 
The  Federal  Government  must  assure  a  national  transportation  system.  Without 
this,  we  have  merely  a  conglomeration  of  state,  regional  and  local  transportation 
systems.  Only  national  policy  and  funding  can  assure  that  all  Americans  have  mo-
bility  options  and  can  afford  to  use  the  system.  Only  national  policy  and  funding 
can  assure  that  our  freight  system  consists  of  rails  and  roads  in  good  condition. 
Only national policy and funding can assure that we rebuild our intercity passenger 
rail  network  and  revitalize  our  transit  systems  to  address  the  current  challenges 
presented  by  a  growing  population,  global  warming,  and  the  need  for  energy  con-
servation and smart land use. 

Finally, I believe that we must define the system first—and then determine what 
method,  or  methods,  we’ll  use  to  pay  for  transportation.  Different  visions  of  the 
transportation  system  call  for  different  funding  sources  and  approaches.  However, 
since  release  of  the  Commission’s  report,  the  discussion  has  focused  on  how  we 
pay—should  we  toll,  raise  the  gas  tax,  sell  the  system  off  to  the  private  sector,  or 
focus  on  an  entirely  new  revenue  approach?  Not  one  of  these  options  is  compelling 
without  a  clear  understanding  of  what  our  citizens  need  and  what  the  system 
should look like. Only with that knowledge can we identify the associated costs, ben-
efits,  and  stakeholders  and  better  understand  the  pros  and  cons  of  each  financing 
approach.  No  one  benefits  from  a  conversation  about  financing  without  under-
standing what it is we need to build. 

These  considerations  highlighted  for  me  the  importance  of  the  Federal  role—be-
cause interstate roads, intercity rail, a sound freight system and world-class transit 
systems cannot, by and large, be built by towns, or villages, or even cities or states. 
All  levels  of  government  need  to  come  together  to  deliver  what  is  among  the  most 
important of government services to citizens—the promise of mobility—to earn a liv-
ing, see a family member, seek health care, or go to school. 
The Commission’s Vision—Program Elements 

After  determining  that  national  needs  were  large  and  that  the  Federal  Govern-
ment had a key role to play in creating national policy and providing Federal fund-
ing,  the  Commission  focused  its  efforts  on  the  Federal  transportation  program.  We 
worked with U.S. DOT staff to learn what is working and not working with the cur-
rent  program.  We  tried  to  envision  a  program  structure  that  would  address  identi-
fied  needs,  support  the  Federal  role,  maintain  Federal,  state  and  local  government 
partnerships, and include the private sector when appropriate to meet national pol-
icy goals. 

The Commissioners agreed that the current program structure is complex beyond 
reason.  Over  the  past  50  years,  more  than  100  separate  programs  have  evolved. 
This translates into an accounting nightmare for state DOTs and others responsible 
for  programming  Federal  dollars.  Each  month,  my  state  DOT  receives  reports  from 
the  Federal  Management  Information  System  (FMIS),  an  FHWA  database  that 
tracks  the  various  categories  of  Federal  funding  that  can  be  applied  to  highway 
projects and assists states in programming their oldest funds first to avoid unneces-
sary funding lapses. Wisconsin’s current report is over 150 pages long, with funding 
accounts  that  date  back  to  the  1980s.  This  report  is  for  highways  alone;  it  doesn’t 
speak to the accounting challenges of our current transit and rail programs. 

The Commission created a program structure that simplifies the existing complex 
array  of  Federal  programs.  We  recommend  that  today’s  100  programs  be  consoli-

1 Council of State Governments, National Governors Association, National Conference of State 
Legislatures,  National  League  of  Cities,  U.S.  Conference  of  Mayors,  National  Association  of 
Counties, International City/County Management Associations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

dated to ten programs that are in the Federal interest.2 The proposed programs are 
designed  to  address  key  Federal  priorities  while  offering  state  and  local  govern-
ments flexibility in applying Federal funds to their needs. 

The  Commissioners  reached  consensus  support  for  Federal  funding  for  transpor-
tation  on  Federal  lands  and  research  that  benefits  the  Federal  program.  The  re-
maining eight programs are the result of long deliberations that began with discus-
sions of the Federal role. 

In  my  testimony,  I  will  address  two  of  the  eight  programs  recommended  by  the 
Commission:  Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  A  Program  to  Serve  High-Growth  Corridors 
by Rail; and Connecting America: A National Access Program for Smaller Cities. 
Intercity Passenger Rail Program 

The  Commissioners  looked  carefully  at  the  Nation’s  population  growth  estimates. 
Experts predict that our population will grow from about 300 million people in 2007 
to 450 million people by 2050. We looked at congestion on our highways and airways 
and quickly recognized that our Federal program must become more multi-modal to 
address population growth and other critical national priorities such as energy con-
servation and global warming. 

Our Commission recognized that Federal policy and funding approaches have, un-
fortunately,  led  to  a  disinvestment  in  passenger  rail  over  the  past  50  years.  Years 
ago,  intercity  passenger  rail  routes  comprised  the  backbone  of  the  country’s  trans-
portation network. Freight rail is investing in its system, but based on a freight rail 
analysis,3 freight  rail  cannot  economically  justify  sufficient  investment  in  its  infra-
structure  to  address  the  demand  for  added  freight  rail  capacity,  much  less  added 
passenger  rail  capacity.  We  must  create  a  healthy,  vibrant  passenger  and  freight 
rail  system  that  can  provide  a  key  mobility  option  for  people  and  freight.  Rail  has 
the added benefit of reducing carbon dioxide and other emissions per passenger mile 
compared to highway and air travel. 

The  Commission  heard  testimony  from  state  and  local  officials  and  others  asking 
for  additional  public  investment  in  intercity  passenger  rail.  The  intercity  program 
includes  a  Federal/state  funding  partnership  for  intercity  passenger  rail  similar  to 
the  partnerships  that  exist  for  highways,  transit  and  aviation.  We  do  not  envision 
rail replacing other transportation modes. We see rail providing greater mobility to 
help meet the needs of our growing and aging population. 

To assist the Commission in advising Congress, I engaged a Passenger Rail Work-
ing  Group  to  develop  a  passenger  rail  analysis.4 This  group  mapped  a  vision  of  the 
national  rail  system  in  2050  and  determined  cost  estimates  to  achieve  this  vision. 
Its  focus  is  city-to-city  connections  in  corridors  of  500  miles  or  less.  The  2050  map, 
contained  in  the  Commission  report,  provides  one  perspective  on  the  future  of  pas-
senger rail and is entirely illustrative. Individual states will be responsible for their 
own  rail  plans.  Many  states  are  already  working  on  estimates  and  plans  for  new 
passenger  rail  service;  they  are  undertaking  this  work  because  they  understand 
their  citizens  want  a  mobility  option—especially  in  light  of  high  gas  prices  and  in-
creasing highway and airway congestion. With Federal support, these states will be 
empowered to implement their passenger rail service plans. 

Of the ten new transportation programs recommended by the Commission, Inter-
city  Passenger  Rail  is  the  only  program  focused  on  one  specific  mode  of  transpor-
tation.  The  Federal  Government  would  fund  80  percent  of  the  program,  similar  to 
what it now provides for other modes. 
Connecting  America:  A  National  Access  Program  for  Smaller  Cities  and 

Rural Areas 

Commissioners  quickly  recognized  the  problems  of  congestion,  inadequate  freight 
capacity,  a  limited  passenger  rail  system  and  lack  of  transit  options  in  some  cities. 
These  are  the  issues  that  get  most  coverage  in  the  news.  However,  there  were 
strong voices as well for the transportation challenges of rural America. 

2 Rebuilding America: A National Asset Management Program; Freight Transportation: A Pro-
gram to Enhance U.S. Global Competitiveness; Congestion Relief: A Program for Improved Met-
ropolitan Mobility; Saving Lives: A National Safe Mobility Program; Connecting America: A Na-
tional Access Program for Smaller Cities and Rural Areas; Intercity Passenger Rail: A Program 
to  Serve  High-Growth  Corridors  by  Rail;  Environmental  Stewardship:  A  Transportation  Invest-
ment  Program  to  Support  a  Healthy  Environment;  Energy  Security:  A  Program  to  Accelerate 
the Development of Environmentally-Friendly Replacement Fuels; Federal Lands: A Program for 
Providing Public Access; Research, Development, & Technology: A Coherent Transportation Re-
search Program for the Nation. 

3 National Rail Freight Infrastructure Capacity and Investment Study, September 2007. 
4 Vision for the Future—U.S. Intercity Passenger Rail Network through 2050, December 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

Commissioners  found  particular  resonance  in  the  following  quote  by  President 
Dwight  Eisenhower:  ‘‘Our  unity  as  a  nation  is  sustained  by  free  communication  of 
thought and by easy transportation of people and goods. . . . Together the unifying 
forces  of  our  communication  and  transportation  systems  are  dynamic  elements  in 
the very name we bear—United States. Without them, we would be a mere alliance 
of  many  separate  parts.’’ 5 All  states—regardless  of  their  population  density,  geo-
graphical size or economic status—depend on their transportation systems for their 
economic vitality and quality of life. 

The  Commission’s  report  does  not  specifically  define  ‘‘rural  states.’’  These  states 
generally  have  higher  lane  miles  and  fewer  people  to  support  the  upkeep  of  their 
roads.  In  many  states,  the  ability  to  raise  adequate  revenues  through  property  and 
income  taxes  is  limited.  They  likely  have  inadequate  Vehicle  Miles  Traveled  (VMT) 
to support a privately managed toll system. In addition, they may have limited tran-
sit services and certainly not the typical transit system found in an urbanized area. 
These states have elderly residents and residents with disabilities who cannot drive 
and have severely limited mobility options. They may have one or two larger cities, 
but beyond the urban area, the state’s population is rural in nature. There are likely 
between 20 and 25 states that fall into the ‘‘rural state’’ category. 

Urban  congestion  may  impact  the  daily  lives  of  most  of  us,  but  we  cannot  ignore 
the extreme needs of our rural areas. Many trips begin, end or travel through rural 
areas.  Rural  roads  and  rail  lines  are  both  critically  important  in  moving  our  goods 
to market. Rural transit services must be implemented to serve residents with lim-
ited  mobility  options.  The  Commission  recommends  the  ‘‘Connecting  America’’  pro-
gram to address the needs of all states with rural areas and to assure the national 
character of our transportation system. 
The Future of the Highway Trust Fund and Paying the Bill 

Our  final  task  was  to  address  financing.  Commissioners  agreed  that  our  Nation 
showed  uncommon  wisdom  in  establishing  the  Highway  Trust  Fund  (HTF).  The 
Clay  Committee  actually  recommended  debt  financing,  specifically  bonding,  as  an 
approach to funding its ten-year highway plan. The Congress looked at this proposal 
and rejected it, believing instead that a pay-as-you-go system was in the best inter-
est  of  the  Nation.  In  light  of  the  current  issues  with  debt  across  our  economy,  we 
should all be grateful for your predecessors’ wisdom on this issue. 

The  Commission  came  down  strongly  on  the  side  of  a  multi-modal  system  where 
all  modes  are  treated  similarly  in  terms  of  their  access  to  the  trust  fund.  We  rec-
ommend renaming the Highway Trust Fund the Surface Transportation Trust Fund 
(STTF).  States  would  then  be  able  to  choose  the  right  transportation  solution—in-
stead of selecting a less-preferable option that assures access to Federal funding. 

We spoke plainly in our Commission report: there is no free lunch when it comes 
to  financing.  Our  Commission  came  down  strongly  on  the  side  of  a  pay-as-you-go 
system.  We  do  not  believe  that  this  is  the  time  to  make  Federal  transportation  in-
vestments  based  on  more  debt.  We  also  faced  up  to  the  issue  that  the  Nation’s 
transportation needs are enormous. Our report outlines a variety of revenue sources 
that could be, and likely should be, tapped to fund the investments we see as impor-
tant. 

We  recognized  that  in  order  to  bring  freight  and  passenger  rail  investments  into 
the  trust  fund,  the  trust  fund’s  resources  must  be  increased  significantly.  The  rec-
ommendation  of  a  gas  tax  increase  of  25  to  40  cents  over  5  years,  with  subsequent 
indexing  to  the  Consumer  Price  Index,  has  been  widely  reported.  Other  rec-
ommended  revenue  increases  to  support  the  new  STTF  include  an  increase  in  con-
tainer fees, custom duties, ticket taxes, and tax incentives for freight transportation 
businesses  investing  in  transportation  infrastructure.  A  carbon  tax  could  be  insti-
tuted or a cap-and-trade system adopted to reduce greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions. 
The  Commission  believes  it  is  appropriate  for  transportation  activities  that  con-
tribute to reductions in GHG emissions to receive a proportionate share of these rev-
enues. 

The  Commission  looked  carefully  at  private  sector  investment  in  large  Interstate 
projects  through  the  use  of  long-term  leases.  The  Interstate  and  National  Highway 
Systems were built with user fees paid for by the citizens of this Nation. Fundamen-
tally, the Commission agreed that the roads and transit systems are not only a pub-
lic  asset;  they  are,  more  importantly,  a  public  good.  Public  ownership  assures  that 
policymakers  are  responsible  to  citizens  for  the  maintenance  and  improvement  of 
our  transportation  assets.  It  also  assures  that  the  value  of  these  assets—and  the 
sizable  public  investment  made  in  them—accrues  to  citizens.  As  these  assets  are 

5 A 10-Year National Highway Program—A Report To The President, The President’s Advisory 

Committee On A National Highway Program, Clay Committee, 1955. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

tolled  to  limit  transportation  demand,  the  mobility  of  our  citizens  and  businesses 
is also limited. In my view, that is not a sound transportation vision for our Nation. 
For  that  reason,  the  Commission  developed  protections  to  assure  that  public  as-
sets and the public good are protected. The current issues plaguing Wall Street and 
our economy with regard to leveraging by large investment banks should be consid-
ered in relation to transportation financing. Leveraging is used in many of the deals 
negotiated  by  states  and  local  governments  with  the  private  sector.  Bear  Stearns 
was involved in transportation financing, both as a bidder on projects and as a con-
sultant  to  governments  reviewing  private  sector  bids.  For  the  past  decade,  Bear 
Stearns hosted transportation conferences focused on increasing private investment 
in what has been primarily a public sector-financed transportation system. 

Congress  will  ultimately  have  to  address  how  to  treat  the  ‘‘shadow  banking  sys-
tem’’  with  its  leveraged  deals  supported  by  complex  financial  instruments  that  by-
pass  financial  regulation.6 Many  of  the  deals  negotiated  by  states  include  private 
equity  firms.  We  should  not  allow  private  companies  to  take  their  profits  from  our 
transportation  system,  while  the  public  takes  the  risk.  My  view  may  be  considered 
old-fashioned; perhaps that is why so many U.S. DOT programs that advocate debt 
call  it  ‘‘innovative  financing.’’  In  my  world,  debt  is  debt.  It  has  its  place,  but  it 
should be considered carefully. 
The Highway Trust Fund Challenge for Federal Fiscal Year 2009 

Before closing, let me comment on the current challenge facing the Highway Trust 
Fund. As this Committee is aware, the Congressional Budget Office (CBO) estimates 
that by the end of Federal Fiscal Year (FFY) 2009, the Highway Account of the HTF 
will  have  a  negative  cash  balance  of  $1.4  billion.  The  Treasury’s  estimate  for  the 
HTF-Highway Account deficit is a negative $3.4 billion. I asked my staff to evaluate 
the  impact  of  the  estimated  HTF-Highway  Account  deficit  on  Wisconsin  in  FFY 
2009 if no corrective action is taken. The following chart identifies how Wisconsin’s 
highway  funding  would  be  affected  under  the  various  proposals,  using  CBO  esti-
mates.  Recall,  if  this  graph  illustrated  Treasury  estimates,  the  FFY  2009  impact 
would  be  much  greater.  All  states  will  be  similarly  impacted  by  the  HTF-Highway 
Account deficit. 

The  next  graph  shows  the  long-term  impact  of  the  HTF-Highway  Account  cash 
balance if the Administration and Congress take no action. Again, the chart is based 
on  CBO  estimates  of  the  HTF-Highway  Account  deficit;  the  Treasury  estimates 
would  show  a  more  significant  reduction  in  highway  funding  to  Wisconsin  in  the 
earlier years. Like the chart above, the estimates for future years can be compared 
with Wisconsin’s highway funding for FFY 2008. 

6 Krugman, Paul, ‘‘Partying Like It’s 1929,’’ The New York Times, March 21, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

1
L
A
S
U
B
2
2
4

20 

With  no  revenue  solution,  the  Mass  Transit  Account  of  the  HTF  will  go  negative 
in  FFY  2012.  With  no  revenue  solution,  neither  account  will  regain  its  FFY  2008 
level  until  the  mid-2020s.  With  no  revenue  solution,  the  Federal  funding  partner-
ship in transportation, for all intents and purposes, will end. 

I am disappointed that the approach taken by the President’s budget is to transfer 
funding from the HTF-Mass Transit Account to the HTF-Highway Account, moving 
the Transit Account deficit 1 year closer. I am troubled by the Administration’s un-
willingness to address the negative cash balance in the HTF-Highway Account. Like 
every challenge, if this issue were confronted earlier, the fix would have been easier. 
Instead, the burden of meeting this challenge is left for Congress, making the reau-
thorization discussion next year all the more difficult. 

I  want  to  thank  the  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  my  views  on  our 
Commission’s work and the short-term issues associated with the potential negative 
HTF-Highway  Account  cash  balance.  Despite  this  short-term  challenge,  I  hope  that 
in  the  Commission  report  you  will  find  a  sound  blueprint  for  the  next  golden  age 
of transportation in the United States. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Our next witness will be Mr. Steve Heminger, he’s a Commission 
member,  of  course,  and  Executive  Director  of  the  Metropolitan 
Transportation Commission for the San Francisco Bay Area. 

STATEMENT OF STEVE HEMINGER, COMMISSIONER, 
NATIONAL SURFACE TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND 

REVENUE STUDY COMMISSION; AND EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION 

Mr.  HEMINGER.  Mr.  Chairman,  and  Senators,  thank  you  for  the 
opportunity  to  testify  today,  I  do  apologize  about  having  to  depart 
early, because of a change in my airline schedule plans. 

If you have a hearing on airline travel, please invite me back. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  HEMINGER.  I  can  fill  you  up  with  a  lot  of  information,  I’m 

sure most Americans can these days. 

In my brief testimony, I’d like to describe 2 of the 10 new Federal 
surface  transportation  investment  areas  which  we  propose  to  re-
place the 108 different spending categories in current law that Jack 
had described. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

2
L
A
S
U
B
2
2
4

21 

The first is in the area of congestion relief, and has the working 
title  of  Metropolitan  Mobility.  In  simple  terms,  this  new  program 
is designed to decongest our major urban areas. 

The  Census  Bureau  tells  us  to  expect  120  million  more  fellow 
citizens by the year 2050, and from a transportation point of view, 
that  kind  of  growth  wouldn’t  be  too  tough  to  handle,  if  it  were 
spread across our vast country—but it won’t be. 

Most  of  these  new  Americans  will  live  where  most  of  today’s 
Americans  live—in  metropolitan  areas.  These  urban  centers  are 
the economic engines of the Nation, and they are bound to become 
even more vital, as America’s population continues to urbanize and 
cluster near large cities. 

In our report, we have focused on major metropolitan areas with 
more  than  1  million  residents.  These  50  or  so  areas  account  for 
about 60 percent of the Nation’s population in GDP, but these same 
areas  capture  an  astonishing  90  percent  of  national  market  share 
for  3  key  transportation  indicators—traffic  congestion,  transit  rid-
ership,  and  population  exposure  to  auto-related  air  pollution.  In  a 
nutshell,  these  major  metros  are  where  the  transportation  action 
is. 

In  1982,  only  Los  Angeles  experienced  congestion  levels  that  ex-
ceeded  40  hours  per  year  for  the  average  commuter.  Today,  that 
level  of  traffic  delay  has  spread  to  nearly  30  urban  areas  around 
the country. We think the Nation needs to set ambitious targets to 
reduce  traffic  congestion  in  these  areas—not  just  slow  the  rate  of 
increase. 

In order to do so, metropolitan officials will surely need more re-
sources,  but  they  will  need  more  authority,  as  well,  to  implement 
market-based  strategies  like  congestion  pricing,  to  help  unclog 
some of our key commute and freight corridors. And with added re-
sources  and  authority,  we  believe  strongly,  should  come  account-
ability, to meet the mobility targets they set. That’s what our Com-
mission  report  means,  when  we  say  performance-based,  and  out-
come-driven.  We  believe  it’s  time  to  stop  complaining  about  traffic 
congestion, and start doing something about it. 

The  second  area  is  in  saving  lives,  and  I  was  gratified  that  so 
many  of  you  mentioned  that  in  your  opening  remarks,  and  I’m 
afraid  to  say  that,  put  bluntly,  our  track  record  on  highway  safety 
in  America  is  a  national  tragedy.  Every  year,  40,000  of  our  fellow 
citizens  die  on  the  Nation’s  highways,  which  is  equivalent  to  a  9/ 
11 every month, month after month, year after year. 

In  addition  to  the  horrible  human  costs,  the  economic  con-
sequences  are  enormous.  According  to  a  study  released  just  last 
month  by  AAA,  the  annual  cost  of  traffic  crashes  in  lost  earnings, 
medical  bills,  and  other  economic  impacts  is  nearly  2.5  times  the 
annual cost of traffic congestion, in the Nation’s urban areas. 

We  constantly  hear  Federal  officials  claim  that  safety  is  job  one, 
and the current Transportation Act is even named ‘‘SAFETEA,’’ yet 
the carnage continues. With the exception of many rural roads that 
do need to be upgraded, our highways themselves are pretty safe— 
it’s  the  drivers  who  are  dangerous.  Driver  behavior  is  where  we 
need to devote much more attention than we have in the past. Just 
as  countries  very  similar  to  ours—like  Great  Britain  and  Aus-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

tralia—have  done  so,  and  achieved  much  lower  fatality  rates  than 
our own. 

Our  Commission  report  proposes  an  aggressive—but  achiev-
able—goal of cutting traffic fatalities in half by 2025. We can reach 
that  goal,  but  only  if  the  combined  might  and  muscle  of  our  Fed-
eral,  State  and  local  governments  are  brought  to  bear.  If  we  do 
reach  that  goal,  it  would  mean  20,000  more  Americans  every  year 
would  be  able  to  tell  their  loved  ones  about  their  drive  home  from 
work each day. 

In  conclusion,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  appreciate  this  opportunity  to 
testify. I hope we are conveying to you today how strongly we feel, 
and  what  a  great  sense  of  urgency  we  feel  in  conveying  this  mes-
sage about the worsening conditions of our Nation’s transportation 
infrastructure. The inefficiencies and under-investment that plague 
the  Nation’s  transportation  network  aren’t  just  about  concrete,  as-
phalt and steel—they jeopardize our national security, they damage 
our ability to compete in a global economy, and they harm our en-
viable quality of life. 

These conditions—to use a phrase that Senator Hutchison used— 
are  unacceptable.  Our  Commission  spent  2  years  looking  for  a 
near-term alternative to the gas tax, but we couldn’t find one. Our 
simple  message  to  the  Congress—and  perhaps  it’s  an  unpleasant 
one—is  that  if  we  want  a  better  transportation  system,  we  are 
going to have to pay for it. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Heminger follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVE HEMINGER,  COMMISSIONER,  NATIONAL SURFACE 
TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND REVENUE STUDY COMMISSION;  AND EXECUTIVE 
DIRECTOR, METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION 
Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  My 
name is Steve Heminger, and I am Executive Director of the Metropolitan Transpor-
tation  Commission  (MTC).  MTC  is  the  metropolitan  planning  organization  for  the 
nine-county  San  Francisco  Bay  Area.  It  allocates  more  than  $1  billion  per  year  in 
funding for the operation, maintenance, and expansion of the region’s surface trans-
portation network. MTC also serves as the Bay Area Toll Authority (BATA) respon-
sible for administering all toll revenue from the seven state-owned bridges that span 
the Bay. BATA has a ‘‘AA’’ credit ratings and has issued over $5 billion in toll rev-
enue bonds to finance bridge, highway, and transit construction projects. 

I was appointed to the National Surface Transportation Policy and Revenue Study 
Commission by House Speaker Nancy Pelosi. It was a rare privilege to serve on that 
Commission, just as it is a distinct honor to appear before this Committee today to 
discuss  our  commission’s  findings  and  recommendations.  In  my  brief  testimony,  I 
would  like  to  describe  two  of  the  ten  new  Federal  surface  transportation  programs 
which  we  propose  to  replace  the  108  different  spending  categories  in  current  law. 
These  two  new  programs  meet  the  rigorous  test  we  developed  for  a  new  beginning 
in  U.S.  surface  transportation  policy:  that  the  Federal  investment  strategy  should 
be  performance-driven,  outcome-based,  generally  mode-neutral,  and  refocused  to 
pursue objectives of genuine national interest. 
1. Congestion Relief 

The first of these new Federal investment programs has the working title of Met-
ropolitan  Mobility.  In  simple  terms,  it  is  designed  to  decongest  our  major  urban 
areas. The Census Bureau tells us to expect 120 million more fellow citizens by the 
year 2050. From a transportation point of view, that kind of growth wouldn’t be too 
tough  to  handle  if  it  were  spread  across  our  vast  country.  But  it  won’t  be.  Most  of 
these new Americans will live where most of today’s Americans already live: in met-
ropolitan  areas.  These  urban  centers  are  the  economic  engines  of  the  nation,  and 
they  are  bound  to  become  even  more  vital  as  America’s  population  continues  to  ur-
banize and cluster near large cities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

In our commission report, Transportation for Tomorrow, we have focused on major 
metropolitan  areas  with  more  than  1  million  residents  (see  Exhibit  1).  These  50  or 
so  areas  account  for  about  60  percent  of  the  Nation’s  population  and  GDP—that’s 
impressive  enough.  But  these  same  areas  capture  an  astonishing  90  percent  of  na-
tional market share for three key transportation indicators: traffic congestion, tran-
sit  ridership,  and  population  exposure  to  auto-related  air  pollution  (see  Exhibit  2). 
In a nutshell, these major metros are where the action is. 

In  1982,  only  Los  Angeles  experienced  congestion  levels  that  exceeded  40  hours 
per  year  for  the  average  commuter.  Today,  that  level  of  traffic  delay  has  spread  to 

s
p
e

.

I

2
N
M
E
H
2
2
4

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
1
N
M
E
H
2
2
4

24 

nearly  30  urban  areas  across  the  country  (see  Exhibit  3).  We  think  the  Nation 
should  set  ambitious  targets  to  reduce  traffic  congestion  in  these  areas—not  just 
slow  the  rate  of  increase.  In  order  to  do  so,  metropolitan  officials  will  need  more 
resources.  But  they  will  need  more  authority  as  well—to  implement  market-based 
strategies  like  congestion  pricing  to  help  unclog  some  of  our  key  commute  and 
freight corridors. And with the added resources and authority should come account-
ability—to  meet  the  mobility  targets  they  set.  That’s  what  our  commission  report 
means when we say ‘‘performance-based’’ and ‘‘outcome-driven’’. We believe it’s time 
to stop complaining about traffic congestion, and start doing something about it. As 
former  Transportation  Secretary  and  former  Congressman  Norm  Mineta  has  said: 
‘‘Congestion is not a fact of life.’’ 

A principal cause of traffic congestion in our metropolitan areas is that trucks car-
rying  goods  and  autos  carrying  commuters  are  competing  for  the  same  scarce  road 
space.  In  addition,  several  major  urban  areas—including  my  own—are  home  to  the 
Nation’s  largest  seaports  where  containerized  cargo  enters  and  exits  the  United 
States (see Exhibit 4). That is why our report advocates strategies to grow the mar-
ket  share  of  both  freight  and  passenger  travel  that  occurs  on  the  Nation’s  rail  net-
work.  It  is  also  why  the  linkage  between  the  Metropolitan  Mobility  Program  and 
the  new  Freight  Transportation  program  we  recommend  will  be  so  critical  to  the 
success of reducing urban traffic congestion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
3
N
M
E
H
2
2
4

25 

2. Saving Lives 

Put bluntly, our track record on highway safety in America is a national tragedy. 
Every year 40,000 of our fellow citizens die on the Nation’s highways—that’s equiva-
lent  to  a  9/11  every  month,  month  after  month,  year  after  year  (see  Exhibit  5).  In 
addition  to  the  horrible  human  cost,  the  economic  consequences  are  enormous.  Ac-
cording to a study released just last month by the American Automobile Association, 
the annual cost of traffic crashes in lost earnings, medical bills, and other economic 
impacts  is  nearly  two  and  a  half  times  the  annual  cost  of  traffic  congestion  in  the 
Nation’s  urban  areas—$164  billion  for  traffic  crashes  vs.  $68  billion  for  congestion. 

s
p
e

.

I

5
N
M
E
H
2
2
4

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
4
N
M
E
H
2
2
4

26 

We  constantly  hear  Federal  officials  claim  that  safety  is  Job  #1,  and  the  current 
transportation  act  is  even  named  SAFETEA,  yet  the  carnage  continues.  With  the 
exception  of  many  rural  roads  that  need  to  be  upgraded,  our  highways  themselves 
are  pretty  safe—it’s  the  drivers  who  are  dangerous.  Driver  behavior  is  where  we 
need to devote much more attention than we have in the past, just as countries very 
similar to ours—like Great Britain and Australia—have done so and achieved much 
lower fatality rates than our own (see Exhibit 6). 

Every  state  should  have  a  primary  seat  belt  law,  but  only  half  do.  Every  state 
should  have  a  motorcycle  helmet  law,  but  only  20  do.  Every  state  should  have  an 
ignition  interlock  law  that  prevents  repeat  drunk  drivers  from  starting  their  car  if 
they’re not sober, but less than a handful do. And once those laws are passed, they 
need to be vigorously enforced to ensure compliance. 

Our commission report proposes an aggressive but achievable goal of cutting traf-
fic fatalities in half by 2025. We can reach that goal, but only if the combined might 
and  muscle  of  our  Federal,  state,  and  local  governments  are  brought  to  bear.  If  we 
do reach that goal, it would mean 20,000 more Americans every year would be able 
to tell their loved ones about their drive home from work each day. 

Again,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  the  Committee.  My  Commis-
sion colleagues and I feel a great sense of urgency in the message we convey to you 
today  about  the  worsening  condition  of  the  Nation’s  transportation  infrastructure. 
The inefficiencies and underinvestment that plague the Nation’s transportation net-
work aren’t just about concrete, asphalt, and steel. They jeopardize our national se-
curity,  damage  our  ability  to  compete  in  a  global  economy,  and  harm  our  enviable 
quality  of  life.  We  simply  cannot  afford  to  pass  this  problem  onto  the  next  genera-
tion. The time to act is now. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Our  next  witness  will  be  Mr.  Matt  Rose.  He’s  Chairman,  Presi-

dent, and Chief Executive Officer of BNSF Railway. 

STATEMENT  OF  MATTHEW  K.  ROSE,  PRESIDENT  AND  CEO, 
BNSF  RAILWAY  COMPANY,  AND  COMMISSIONER,  NATIONAL 
SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  POLICY  AND  REVENUE  STUDY 
COMMISSION 
Mr. ROSE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

I

s
p
e
6
N
M
E
H
2
2
4

27 

It’s  a  pleasure  to  be  here  with  you  today,  I’m  sitting  next  to  my 
colleague,  Pat  Quinn,  who  represented  the  ATA  as  CEO  of  U.S. 
Xpress,  one  of  our  largest  shippers  in  the  trucking  industry.  Pat 
and  I  spent  a  lot  of  time  on  this  over  the  last  couple  of  years, 
thinking  about  the  freight  side  of  what—what  you  all  asked  us  to 
study.  I  brought  a  couple  of  slides,  if  the  technology  will  come  on 
here,  in  a  minute.  But  what  I  want  to  do  is  just  take  you  through 
a  couple  of  facts  of  what  we  accumulated  during  this  2-year  proc-
ess. 

The  first  one,  really,  begs  the  question  of  what’s  different  right 
now  for  the  next  25  years,  versus  the  past  25  years?  And  simply 
said, the big difference is that we’ve really used up all of the excess 
capacity  that  we’ve  had  in  both  the  highway  system  and  the  rail 
system. 

Let  me  give  you  just  a  couple  of  examples.  In  the  railroad  sys-
tem, over the last 25 years, we’ve actually reduced rail miles by al-
most 40 percent in this country. So, we’ve reduced rail miles by 40 
percent,  yet  we’ve  increased  gross  ton  miles,  or  units  of  measure, 
by almost 65 percent. 

In  the  highway  system,  we’ve  actually  increased  highway  miles 
by  about  7  percent  in  terms  of  adding  to  our  highway  system,  but 
look  at  what  we’ve  done  in  terms  of  VMTs,  vehicle  miles  traveled, 
increasing almost 96 percent. 

And  so,  where  we  found  ourselves  is  really  at  the  tipping  point, 
in terms of all of the excess capacity. All of these various networks 
is  now  gone,  and  as  we  think  about  the  next  25  years,  it  really  is 
a  significantly  different  business  proposition,  versus  the  past  25 
years. 

The next issue, really, that will drive what we firmly believe will 
be  a  transportation  crisis,  is  really  just  the  issue  of  compounding 
numbers  of  population  growth,  of  trade  growth,  of  GDP  growth— 
whatever you want to look at. If you think about just what a 2 per-
cent  growth  of  GDP—which  is  something  that  we  would  all  expect 
to  rely  on  for  this  economy—you  can  see  the  type  of  numbers  that 
that’s going to relate to. 

We’re  going  to  end  up  seeing  our  population  grow  to  about  338 
million  people  by  the  year  2020,  again,  that’s  going  to  only  be  a 
CAGR  of  about  1  percent,  but  look  at  what  happens  to  the  gross 
ton  miles  of  the  freight  network—it’s  going  to  have  to  grow  by 
about  2  percent,  just  to  keep  up  with  this  normal  growth  in  the 
economy. 

Senator  Smith  mentioned  the  issue  of  congestion  costs  in  our 
economy,  Texas  A&M  actually  studies  congestive  costs,  which  is  a 
interesting  proposition.  Texas  A&M  will  report  right  around  that 
number the Senator mentioned, about $70 billion a year. 

And  while  that  may  not  sound  like  a  lot  on  a  $13  trillion  econ-
omy,  again,  the  congestive  costs  start  to  multiply,  and  by  the  year 
2020,  they’re  expecting  for  the  economy  to  see  about  $200  billion 
worth of congestive costs. 

One  of  the  other  ways  that  our  shippers,  your  manufacturing 
companies,  the  retailers  of  the  country—they  see  these  congestive 
costs  when  we  measure  supply  chain  costs  as  a  percent  of  GDP. 
This number in our country has fallen every year for the past sev-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

eral decades, to where the United States has the most efficient sup-
ply chain costs of anywhere in the world. 

28 

And  you  say,  ‘‘Well,  how  does  that  relate?’’  Well,  quite  frankly, 
it  allows  us  to  be  global  traders,  and  it  allows  us  to  get  our  goods 
to places all around the world. We have done this through Just-In- 
Time,  we’ve  done  this  through  excellent  highway  systems,  railroad 
systems, all of these things. 

You’ll  notice,  though,  the  last  couple  of  years,  that  line  started 
to  tick  up.  And  that’s,  really,  what  the  customers  and  what  our 
consumers  are  starting  to  see—the  transportation  is  actually  be-
coming  inverted,  and  actually  starting  to  cost  our  economy,  going 
forward. 

Well,  the  Commission  recommended  a  number  of  things  for 
freight  rails,  specifically,  to  include  tax  incentives  to  stimulate 
more  growth,  rational  regulation  to  make  sure  that  the  regulatory 
model  that  we’re  under  would  incentivize  railroads  like  myself  to 
be  able  to  invest  more  in  our  rail  property,  and  not  less.  Finally, 
the  Commission  took  a  mode-neutral  approach  against  all  of  the 
programmatic reforms that I’ve outlined. 

One of the great opportunities that, quite frankly, our society has 
is  to  rely  more  on  freight  rail,  and  this  is  a  chart  that  shows  the 
cumulative  investment  of  the  railroad  industry  over  the  last  10 
years,  and  you  can  see  the  line  in  the  year  2006  and  the  all-time 
record high of almost $10 billion, if you add all of the various cap-
ital that we see flowing through the system. 

And  again,  the  line  graph  there  represents  return  on  invested 
capital.  This  business  model,  while  it  isn’t  perfect,  it’s  working 
very,  very  well,  as  return  on  invested  capital  is  increased  for  the 
railroad industry, you’re seeing the railroads spend record levels of 
capital investment. 

The  other  thing  that,  through  the  Commission,  we  did,  for  the 
first  time  ever,  we  put  together  the  large  Class  Is,  in  a  virtual 
sense, and looked at going out to the year 2035 and asked the basic 
question,  ‘‘Will  the  railroads  have  enough  capacity  to  handle  that 
2  percent  CAGR  growth  for  the  next  25  and  30  years?’’  And  what 
we  found,  that  right  now,  if  you  think  about  that  growth  again— 
both  population  as  well  as  GDP—the  railroads  will  need  to  spend 
about  $135  billion  through  this  period,  through  the  year  2035,  in 
our  physical  plant,  to  be  able  to  handle  this  level  of  growth.  Right 
now,  at  spending  at  record  capital  amounts,  the  railroads  will 
spend about $70 billion. 

We would also expect through better productivity, to get an addi-
tional $26 billion, because productivity is our friend in terms of ca-
pacity creation. We’re totaling about $96 billion, or $100 billion, so 
that  leaves  us  with  a  gap  of  about  $40  billion  that  the  railroads 
need to find a way to solve for, to be able to handle the future rail 
capacity of our country. 

So,  the  question  obviously  is,  how  do  we  close  that  gap?  Senator 
Smith  and  others  have  been  instrumental  in  helping  us  think 
through  what  will  make  railroads  invest  more  money?  And  we’ve 
been  proud  to  support  the  Senator’s  Capacity  Expansion  Act— 
which  is  really  an  investment  tax  credit  that  will  incentivize  rail-
roads  to  go  out  and  do  things  that  they  otherwise  wouldn’t  have 
done. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

You  all  just  passed  a  stimulus  bill  here,  recently,  that  had  in  it 
some  accelerated  depreciation,  and  railroad  CEOs  like  myself  did 
exactly what the smart economists told you we would do—we went 
out and we upped our capital program for this year by buying more 
locomotives  and  other  things,  that  that  would  allow  us  to  take  ad-
vantage of those various tax instruments. 

The other thing you’ll hear from this Commission time and time 
again  is  the  need  to  really  develop—to  develop  a  national  freight 
program.  Everywhere  we  went  in  the  country,  the  thing  that  was 
most compelling, I think, to the Commissioners was how significant 
this  issue  was  raised  around  a  freight  mobility  crisis—not  only  on 
the  highways—but  also  in  the  overall  railroads.  And  examples  of 
this  are  listed  here.  Things  like  rail  corridor  developments,  inter- 
modal  connectors,  looking  at  implementation  of  train  control  tech-
nology—all of these things, again, define ways to increase the over-
all freight rail, and freight capacity of our overall network. 

We  studied  a  lot  around  public-private  partnerships.  We  studied 
what would be the ideal-type public-private partnerships and what 
should  be  the  principles  around  these  public-private  partnerships? 
And here are a couple of things the Commission recommended—ev-
erything  from  standardization  of  these  public-private  partnerships 
to  making  sure  that  there  are  no  misallocation  of  public  funds  to 
these  projects.  Making  sure  that  all  of  the  grants  and  loans  and 
public  financing  for  rail-related  projects  doesn’t  supplant  or  dimin-
ish actual private investment that we see going on right now. 

We also looked about the real, underlying realization of our glob-
al society now, and quite frankly, global trade is one thing that has 
really  changed  our  transportation  infrastructure,  and  we  spend  a 
lot of time discussing a freight fee, whether or not we could support 
something like that. 

And  we  looked  at  a  lot  of  different  models,  my  favorite  is  to  di-
rect  a  portion  of  the  Customs  fee  out  of  the  current  process,  a  5 
percent direction of a Customs fee into a national freight fee, would 
provide  almost  $2  billion  a  year  to  apply  to  those  bottlenecks  that 
we have in these freight areas all over the country. 

There’s  a  lot  of  issues,  though,  when  we  think  about  a  Customs 
fee—or  any  type  of  freight  fee—that  must  come  into  play.  First,  it 
really  must  link  and  dedicate—as  directly  as  possible—to  the  use 
of what you’re trying to remediate. It’s got to be predictable, it’s got 
to  be  dedicated  and  sustained  on  a  pay-as-you-go  basis.  And,  it 
can’t  discriminate.  It  has  to  be—the  ultimate  consumer  will  bear 
the cost, and, most importantly, we believe it needs to be nationally 
coordinated. 

As  Frank  mentioned,  we  spent  a  lot  of  time  on  passenger  rail, 
and  we  did  spend  a  lot  of  time  looking  at  the  regional  passenger 
rail, because we believe this is the most efficient way to be able to 
take  vehicles  off  the  highway  system,  given  also  what  we  know  is 
ahead of us in terms of greenhouse gases and our crisis on foreign 
oil imports. 

With all of these things, there’s a lot of warnings ahead in terms 
of when we start changing the actual funding of all of these various 
systems.  There  are  some  cautions.  First,  the  public  will  not  accept 
higher  fuel  taxes  and  other  fees,  if  the  system  isn’t  overhauled.  In 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

other  words,  every  dollar  of  transportation  that  we  spend  in  this 
country, has to go to remediating transportation issues. 

Second, shippers will not accept any type of user fee, unless prin-
ciples  around  those  investments  are  fair  and  transparent.  For  ex-
ample, inter-modal shippers should not pay for coal capacity expan-
sion, and vice versa. 

Third, railroads will not accept public funds with obligations not 

central to the investment, if strings are attached. 

And fourth, we all agree that the lack of action will result in fur-
ther degradation of our transportation efficiency, and ultimately af-
fect our global competitiveness. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Rose follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MATTHEW K. ROSE, PRESIDENT AND CEO, BNSF RAILWAY 
COMPANY AND COMMISSIONER,  NATIONAL SURFACE TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND 
REVENUE STUDY COMMISSION 
Good  morning  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  and  Members  of  the 
Committee.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to 
discuss  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Study  Commis-
sion’s report and findings. 

At the outset, I would like to say that it has been an honor to serve on this Com-
mission, and I was privileged to work with my fellow Commissioners, each of whom 
brought  a  unique  perspective  to  our  work  and  from  which  I  learned  a  great  deal. 
I  would  also  like  to  thank  Department  of  Transportation  Secretary,  Mary  Peters; 
former  Transportation  Secretary,  Norm  Mineta;  and  acting  Transportation  Sec-
retary, Maria Cino, for their collective leadership in chairing the Commission. I can 
tell  you  that  considering  the  expertise  and  strongly  held  views  of  the  Commis-
sioners, leading this group was no small task. 

My own perspective, of course, is shaped by my long career in the freight logistics 
business,  and  I  should  make  it  clear  that  I  speak  only  for  myself,  as  a  Commis-
sioner, and not for the railroad industry as a whole. The Commission’s deliberations 
addressed a number of issues about which a railroad CEO naturally has some skep-
ticism—such as expanding the highway system, a larger passenger rail program and 
a  Federal  freight  program  partially  funded  by  a  user  fee.  Thus,  it  was  important 
to me that the Commission’s recommendations, especially those for achieving freight 
and  passenger  mobility  goals,  were  effective  and  not  made  at  the  expense  of  stake-
holders  in  America’s  freight  system.  I  believe  the  Commission  generally  has  suc-
ceeded in this regard and that the Commission’s proposals on these subjects should 
be  carefully  considered  by  Congress  as  it  develops  a  comprehensive  transportation 
program aimed at sustainably preserving mobility and economic growth. 

Regardless  of  whether  some  or  all  of  the  Commission’s  recommendations  are  en-
acted  by  Congress,  I  believe  this  report  is  an  unqualified  success  in  demonstrating 
to  Congress—and  the  drivers  and  consumers  who  elect  them—that  freight  mobility 
is essential to jobs, global competitiveness and quality of life. 

When the Commission began its deliberations and receiving the views of the pub-
lic almost 2 years ago, it was clear to me that key transportation, economic develop-
ment  and  academic  experts  understand  how  critical  freight  transportation  is  to  the 
U.S. economy. Witness after witness from every part of the country underscored the 
importance  of  decongesting  and  expanding  freight  networks.  Frankly,  I  was  a  little 
surprised  and  pleased  at  how  the  importance  of  freight  mobility  is  increasingly  ap-
preciated outside of the logistics community. 

Thus, goods movement became a fundamental element of the Commission’s work. 
The  Commission  made  policy  and  programmatic  recommendations  to  promote  effi-
cient freight networks, in contrast to the nearly exclusive focus on passenger mobil-
ity  in  all  of  the  preceding  comprehensive  surface  transportation  laws.  In  fairness, 
things are different today than they were even at the time of enactment of the last 
surface transportation bill. The Commission found that we are at a freight capacity 
tipping  point.  For  all  modes,  freight  capacity  is  tight,  reflected  in  both  higher  costs 
to  the  supply  chain  and  consumers  and  in  the  environmental  impacts  associated 
with congestion and increased volumes. 

One  of  the  most  important  byproducts  of  this  report  is  the  Cambridge  System-
atics/AAR  Study,  which  benchmarks  current  U.S.  freight  rail  capacity  in  key  cor-
ridors  and  projects  needed  to  expand  capacity  into  the  future,  based  on  freight  vol-
ume growth levels presumed by the Commission. Such a study has never been done 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

before; it was not necessary. Now, however, the economy is a reflection of the freight 
rail  network,  and  policymakers  should  have  a  better  understanding  of  what  that 
means,  the  consequences  of  inaction  and  be  given  recommendations  for  a  path  for-
ward. 

As many of you on the dais know, I invariably ask elected officials to weigh policy 
proposals  against  whether  implementation  will  result  in  more  freight  capacity,  or 
less. The Cambridge Study tells us how much more freight rail capacity the country 
needs  if  we  want  to  continue  to  realize  the  economic  and  environmental  benefits  of 
an efficient national freight rail network. Understanding future freight rail capacity 
needs will also help policymakers evaluate whether public policy proposals—on pas-
senger  rail,  public-private  partnerships,  economic  and  other  regulation—help 
achieve needed freight rail capacity expansion, the vast majority of which has been, 
and will continue to be, privately funded and maintained by the railroads. 

The  Commission  concluded  that  freight  rail  capacity  needs  to  be  expanded  sys-
tematically over the next 15, 30 and 50 years, and also determined that freight rail 
market  share  should  be  increased.  Significantly,  the  Commission  recognized  that 
private investment is the key driver of freight rail network expansion. I know first- 
hand  that  if  government  regulation—economic,  safety,  security,  environmental, 
labor—is  not  based  in  cost-benefit  analysis  and  an  understanding  of  the  impact  of 
implementation  on  re-investment,  it  will  choke  off  private  spending  on  expansion 
capital.  Obviously,  railroads  are  not  the  only  private  sector  provider  of  transpor-
tation to whom this principle applies. Thus, the Commission found that rational reg-
ulatory  policy  is  important  to  successfully  promoting  investment  and  productivity 
for  all  of  the  Nation’s  private  sector  providers  of  transportation.  This  is  one  of  the 
most important conceptual underpinnings of the report. 

The  Commission  also  recognized  the  value  of  tax  incentives  in  spurring  needed 
investment  in  capacity  expansion.  It  recommended  a  Federal  investment  tax  credit 
as  a  way  to  expand  rail  network  capacity.  This  has  been  proposed  by  the  freight 
rail  industry  as  a  way  to  invest  faster  to  meet  market  demand.  The  expansion  tax 
credit, together with immediate expensing of the remaining 75 percent of capital in-
vestment,  would  reduce  expansion  project  costs  by  approximately  30  percent.  The 
net  effect  is  that  project  return  would  increase  by  3  percent  to  4  percent,  making 
the  investment  in  expansion  more  likely  and  on  an  earlier  timeline.  It  is  enough 
of  an  incentive  so  that  a  good  investment  will  be  made  earlier,  but  not  excessive 
so  as  to  spur  a  bad  investment.  The  Commission’s  recommendation  extends  also  to 
the maintenance tax credit needed by the short line industry. 

Beyond  tax  policy,  this  Committee  should  also  seriously  consider  the  Commis-
sion’s new freight mobility programmatic recommendations to the surface transpor-
tation  programs.  Specifically,  the  Commission  recommended  a  freight  program 
which  is  intended  to  afford  broad  flexibility  to  implement  freight-related  projects 
that  are  currently  beyond  the  traditional  modal  authorizations.  With  regard  to 
freight  rail,  the  Commission  recognized  that  there  are  projects  that  produce  sub-
stantial  public  benefits  but  from  which  railroads  would  not  benefit  enough  oper-
ationally  to  make  the  investment  on  their  own.  These  projects  might  reduce  vehic-
ular  congestion,  transportation  environmental  impacts  or  even  improve  freight  effi-
ciency;  however,  there  is  a  higher  need  for  the  railroad’s  finite  investment  dollar 
elsewhere. This proposed freight mobility program helps bridge the gap between the 
projects  in  which  the  railroads  must  invest  to  keep  networks  strong  and  expanding 
to meet market demand and projects that serve national, state and local freight mo-
bility goals. Projects eligible for the freight mobility program would serve the public 
interest  in  improving  mobility  and  eliminating  chokepoints  and  their  related  envi-
ronmental impacts. 

The  Commission  envisioned  eligible  public-private  partnership  projects  to  include 
intermodal connectors, strategic national rail bridges where the cost of construction 
exceeds  return  on  private  invested  capital,  train  control  technology  and  assistance 
in  corridor  development.  In  addition,  eligibility  would  include  development  of 
‘‘green’’  intermodal  facilities  and  operations,  and  on/near  dock  facilities,  which  can 
reduce vehicular congestion, emissions and noise and can improve safety. 

Proposed  projects  would  be  the  product  of  cooperation  between  freight  railroads 
and  the  public  sector—as  they  are  now—but  with  the  formality  imposed  by  a  Na-
tional  Freight  Transportation  Plan,  which  calls  upon  Federal,  state,  local  and  pri-
vate  stakeholders  to  evaluate  projects  using  cost-benefit  analysis.  This  process  also 
will formally implement the principles recognized by the Commission that public en-
tities  and  private  entities  should  pay  for  their  respective  benefits,  that  publicly- 
funded  projects  should  not  require  non-economic  private  investment  or  service,  and 
that public investment should not supplant, diminish or strand private investment. 
The  Commission  made  a  recommendation  that  more  funding  from  a  variety  of 
sources  should  help  pay  for  the  projects  undertaken  through  this  program.  These 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

include  gas  tax  revenues,  a  portion  of  the  existing  Customs  revenues,  and  poten-
tially a freight fee and any carbon-related revenues that may result if Congress reg-
ulates  green  house  gases.  In  addition,  the  Commission  acknowledged  that  freight 
projects  should  receive  funding  from  other  programs—environmental,  passenger 
rail, transit, metropolitan mobility—if they meet the goals of those programs. 

I believe that, since trade is the key driver for these increasing volumes, Customs 
duties are an appropriate stream of revenue for funding a freight program. Customs 
duties, with established collection and administration, have the added benefit of not 
displacing  freight  between  ports  of  entry.  Dedicating  5  percent  of  current  Customs 
duties for investment in freight projects would generate about $1.8 billion annually 
and  $20  billion  cumulatively  through  2017.  Dedicating  10  percent  of  current  Cus-
toms  revenues  would  yield  $3.6  billion  annually  and  $49  billion  cumulatively 
through 2017. 

The Commission was not specific about the form of any freight fee which Congress 
might authorize—such as a container fee, or waybill surcharge. However, it did cor-
rectly qualify that any fee considered by Congress should be designed to ensure that 
commerce is not burdened. At the same time, Congress should ensure that local and 
state  proliferation  of  such  fees  are,  in  general,  preempted.  In  addition,  no  mode  of 
transportation  or  port  of  entry  should  be  unduly  advantaged  or  disadvantaged.  A 
national  freight  fee  is  preferred  to  individual  state  fee  initiatives  that  are  now 
emerging  in  several  states,  which  may  inadvertently  distort  global  trade  flows  and 
result in diverting congestion from one port region to another. A national fee is the 
best way of keeping a level playing field across national freight networks. 

The  Commission  also  found  that  a  fee  must  be  designed  to  ensure  that  the  ulti-
mate consumer bears the cost. This means that any freight fee is paid by the bene-
ficial  cargo  owner,  not  transportation  intermediaries  such  as  steamship,  trucking, 
or  rail  companies.  An  issue  with  fees  assessed  against  carriers  is  their  inability  to 
pass these fees on in a competitive marketplace, which will result in reducing their 
ability  to  re-invest.  Furthermore,  the  administrative  burden  to  bill  and  collect  a 
Federal freight fee should not be put on the private sector. 

The Commission recognized that the payers of such a fee must realize the benefit 
of  improved  freight  flows  resulting  from  projects  funded  by  the  freight  program. 
This is a fundamental user fee principle. It is essential to recognize that any freight 
fee is the shipper’s money—private funding—which should be invested in ways that 
result  in  increased  freight  velocity,  capacity  and  additional  reliability.  It  will  take 
additional  revenues  from  all  sources—including  gas  taxes,  Customs  duties  and  po-
tentially revenues from any greenhouse gas regulatory program—to better meet the 
public’s mobility and environmental goals. 

I  expect  that  freight  stakeholders  and  Congress  will  have  a  strong  debate  about 
specifics of a freight fee and whether a ‘‘freight trust fund’’ should be created to ad-
minister  it.  The  rail  industry  has  long  been  opposed  to  that  concept  because  there 
is little ‘‘trust’’ that the funds would flow to projects that meet the goals of an inte-
grated goods-movement strategy—versus the political earmarking process. The Com-
mission  called  upon  Congress  to  create  an  accountable  and  transparent  pro-
grammatic  linkage  between  an  assessed  freight  fee  and  the  selection  and  funding 
of projects that facilitate growing trade-driven freight volumes. 

In  my  opinion,  conditions  placed  by  Congress  around  the  use  of  the  freight  fee 
will  be  critical  to  whether  freight  stakeholders  are  able  to  come  to  agreement  on 
such  a  proposal.  To  ensure  the  wisest  use  of  resources,  the  Commission  rec-
ommended  the  development  of  a  National  Freight  Plan  and  a  NASTRAC  to  ensure 
that  only  effective,  high  priority  projects  would  receive  funding.  In  the  absence  of 
some  kind  of  strong  program  governance  for  funding  freight  projects,  I  could  not 
support any freight fee and related freight trust fund. 

Next, I would like to address the passenger rail recommendations of the Commis-
sion’s findings and recommendations. I believe that it is self-evident that passenger 
rail  has  a  place  in  America’s  transportation  future,  given  the  energy  and  environ-
mental challenges this country faces. 

First  and  foremost,  this  country  should  raise  its  sights  and  view  separated  right 
of  way,  high-speed  passenger  rail  as  a  starting  point,  rather  than  an  end  point,  of 
its passenger rail vision. Incrementalism—where more passenger rail is added to ex-
isting  freight  networks  until  capacity  is  full—will  be  frustrating  and  potentially 
counterproductive  in  light  of  growing  freight  volumes.  This  Committee  should  com-
mit  itself  to  a  bold  vision  of  high-speed  passenger  rail  in  the  next  transportation 
bill. 

However, the current reality is a system of joint use by freight and passenger rail. 
While  the  Commission  envisions  high  speed  rail,  it  also  addressed  the  joint  use 
model  and,  in  so  doing,  was  clear  about  the  need  to  protect  and  expand  the  under-
lying  freight  network.  Throughout  the  Commission’s  passenger  rail  discussions,  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

recognized that it is nonsensical to impede operations and expansion of freight rail, 
the  most  fuel-  and  cost-efficient  and  environmentally  friendly  means  of  moving 
growing  volumes,  thus  driving  freight  to  the  Nation’s  highways.  That  is  an  impor-
tant externality in any cost-benefit analysis. 

Specifically,  the  Commission  upheld  the  principle  that  access  by  passenger  pro-
viders  to  freight  rail  networks,  where  reasonable,  must  be  negotiated  at  an  arm’s 
length with freight railroads, and the impact on present and future corridor capacity 
must be mitigated to ensure that rail freight capacity is not reduced, but enhanced. 
This recognizes that speed differences between passenger and freight trains and cer-
tain  well-defined  passenger  service  requirements  must  be  taken  into  account  and 
that there must be a fair assignment of costs based on the ongoing cost of passenger 
services.  These  costs  include  the  cost  of  upgrading  and  maintaining  track,  signals 
and structures to support joint freight and passenger operations, and the costs asso-
ciated  with  sealed  or  grade  separated  joint  use  corridors.  Finally,  it  goes  without 
saying  that  all  host  railroads  must  be  adequately  and  comprehensively  protected 
through  indemnification  and  insurance  for  all  risks  associated  with  passenger  rail 
service. In short, the Commission’s vision recognizes that in order to be a true trans-
portation alternative for Americans, passenger rail cannot be achieved on the cheap, 
as it has been to date. 

I  would  like  to  point  out  the  other  findings  and  recommendations  in  the  report 
that have positive implications for freight mobility. The Commission made extensive 
recommendations  for  streamlining  the  project  permitting  process  and  specifically 
recognized that privately funded freight rail projects often face the same costly chal-
lenges  and  delays.  In  our  discussions,  the  importance  of  preserving  Federal  pre- 
emption  in  this  regard  was  recognized.  In  addition,  the  Commission  recommended 
an environmental stewardship program, which recognizes ways to improve the envi-
ronmental  impacts  of  freight  operations.  The  recommendations  envision  tax  incen-
tives for deployment of cleaner locomotives, and funding for retrofitting locomotives 
with clean-burning technology. 

I  believe  the  Commission  succeeded  in  this  report  in  bringing  the  rail  sector  to 
the  policy  table  in  a  way  that  has  never  been  done  before.  The  Commission  rec-
ommends  a  more  mode-neutral  approach  that  allows  policymakers  to  recognize 
freight  rail’s  inherent  cost  effectiveness,  fuel  efficiency  and  environmental  sustain-
ability  in  program  and  project  funding  decisions.  That’s  new,  and  it  should  help 
level the playing field between modes and result in greater benefits to drivers, com-
munities and the environment. 

In  conclusion,  it  is  a  privilege  to  transmit  the  Commission’s  findings  to  you  and 
formally  conclude  the  work  that  Congress  asked  us  to  do.  I  am  confident  that  the 
call to action which the Commission makes will be carefully evaluated by this com-
mittee,  and  that  it  will  give  careful  attention  to  the  freight  mobility  and  passenger 
rail findings and recommendations of the Commission. I look forward to your delib-
eration of these findings, and those of others yet to come before you, as you prepare 
for what may be one of the most important reauthorization bills yet. 

Senator SMITH. Mr. Chairman? 
Senator PRYOR. Yes, sir? 
Senator SMITH. May I ask Mr. Rose a question to clarify a num-

ber? 

Senator PRYOR. Sure. 
Senator SMITH. Matt, you indicated that we had added 6 percent 
to  our  surface  transportation,  highways,  and  like  90  percent  in-
crease in demand. What was the rail figure, again? 

Mr. ROSE. It’s down 39 percent in terms of rail miles, and up 65 

percent in terms of gross ton miles. 

Senator SMITH. And is it down in rail miles because we’ve taken 

a lot of shortline railroads? Why is it down 33 percent? 

Mr.  ROSE.  You  know,  really,  Senator,  it’s  just—if  you  go  back  in 
the  1970s  and  the  early  1980s,  the  system  was  in  chaos.  And  you 
had  a  number  of  rail  lines  in  bankruptcies,  and  a  lot  of  those  rail 
lines,  quite  frankly,  became  bike  paths,  and  a  lot  of  those  are  dor-
mant right-of-ways, all across the country. 

Senator SMITH. As you look at the increase in the capital invest-

ment that the railroads are making, will that number shrink? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Mr.  ROSE.  It  will,  but  it  will  be  like  the  highway  miles,  I  mean, 
right  now  we’re  expanding—we’re  putting  record  capital  in  expan-
sion of the number of miles we’re adding. But, like at BNSF, we’re 
talking  about  hundreds  of  rail  miles,  on  a  base  of  33,000.  So,  it’s 
just  like  the  highways—you’re  going  to  see  increase  in  rail  miles, 
I  believe,  but  it  will  be  quite  de  minimus,  in  terms  of  the  overall 
number. 

And  I  think  it’s  also  important  to  point  out,  you  know,  while  it 
sounds—it sounds dramatic, and it is, rail miles down 39 percent— 
a  lot  of  those  rail  miles  are  not,  of  course,  in  the  heavy  metropoli-
tan  areas  and  these  heavy  trade  lanes.  And  if  you  really,  again, 
focus  on  what  has  really  changed  in  our  society,  we  used  to  be  a 
production  and  a  consumption  society—now  we’re  much  more  of  a 
consumption  society,  so  we’ve  got  these  rail  miles  that  used  to 
serve  these  smaller  areas,  quite  frankly,  isn’t  where  the  big  global 
trade  is.  And  it’s  not  where  our  agricultural  exports  are  going, 
things like that. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Next  we  have  Mr.  Patrick  Quinn,  he’s  Co-Chairman  and  Presi-

dent, U.S. Xpress Enterprises. 

STATEMENT OF PATRICK E. QUINN, CO-CHAIRMAN AND 
COMMISSIONER, NATIONAL SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

PRESIDENT, U.S. XPRESS ENTERPRISES, INC. AND 

POLICY AND REVENUE STUDY COMMISSION 

Mr. QUINN. Good afternoon. 
My name is Pat Quinn and I am the Co-Chairman of U.S. Xpress 
Enterprises.  U.S.  Xpress  Enterprises  is  headquartered  in  Chat-
tanooga,  Tennessee,  and  I  also  had  the  privilege  of  serving  as  the 
immediate  past  Chairman  of  the  American  Trucking  Associations, 
the  national  trade  association  of  the  trucking  industry.  I  was  ap-
pointed to this Commission by Senator Bill Frist. 

U.S.  Xpress  Enterprises  is  the  Nation’s  third-largest,  privately 
owned truckload carrier, with a fleet in excess of 7,500 tractors and 
22,000  trailers.  The  company  is  one  of  the  largest  providers  of  ex-
pedited  and  time-definite  services  in  the  truckload  industry  and  a 
leader  in  providing  expedited  inter-modal  rail  services  with  part-
ners such as Mr. Rose’s company, sitting here next to me. 

Mr. Chairman, I came to this infrastructure commission with the 
goal  of  convincing  my  fellow  Commissioners  of  the  need  for  a  new 
national  transportation  vision  that  put  a  priority  on  a  freight  sys-
tem  that  would  serve  the  needs  of  our  Nation’s  economy.  That  vi-
sion would include a strong Federal role today, and continuing over 
the next 25 to 50 years. 

I’m  pleased  to  discover  they  didn’t  need  any  convincing.  Even 
more  importantly,  we  scheduled  hearings  around  the  country  and 
heard  testimony  from  a  wide  range  of  interested  parties,  we  found 
out  that  the  public  really  does  not  need  any  convincing.  This  may 
well  be  a  case  where  the  public  is  far  ahead  of  the  policymakers 
in  understanding  that  our  ability  to  move  goods  efficiently,  safely, 
and in a timely manner needs to be a national priority. 

In  addition  to  the  Commission’s  recommendations  regarding 
freight movement as a national priority, I also would like to briefly 
comment on several other recommendations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Regarding  financing,  the  Commission  report  reasserts  the  long- 
standing  Federal  policy  of  user  financing.  Specifically,  the  report 
states  that,  ‘‘personal  and  commercial  travelers  should  pay  for  the 
transportation  systems  and  services  they  use  in  proportion  to  the 
costs associated with their use.’’ 

Furthermore,  the  Commission  report  acknowledges  that  the  pri-
mary  funding  source  for  highway  infrastructure  needs  should  re-
main  the  Federal  fuel  tax,  both  on  gasoline  and  diesel  fuel.  And 
while the Commission report recognizes that alternatives to the tax 
may be necessary in 15 to 20 years, it also points out that the fuel 
tax  has  the  following  key  attributes:  low  administrative  and  com-
pliance  costs;  ability  to  generate  substantial  amounts  of  revenues; 
relative  stability  and  predictability;  and  ease  of  implementation.  I 
believe  those  principles  should  be  the  benchmark  against  which 
Congress evaluates future alternatives to the fuel tax. 

Equally  important,  the  Commission  report  recommends  that 
Congress  needs  to  enact  strict  criteria  and  conditions  for  the  ap-
proval of any new tolling or privatization initiatives, in order to en-
sure that the public interest is protected. From the trucking indus-
try’s perspective, the allure of privatization of our Nation’s highway 
infrastructure  runs  counter  to  the  very  needs  of  interstate  com-
merce and a national highway network. 

Obviously,  reform  of  the  program  is  important,  and  one  of  the 
most important recommendations of the Commission centers on the 
relationship  between  the  need  for  additional  revenues  and  the  re-
form of the program. The Commission report also states that, ‘‘sim-
ply  raising  the  Federal  fuel  tax  and  putting  more  money  into  the 
same  programs  will  not  be  acceptable.’’  The  Commission  report 
clearly  states  that  before  any  Federal  financial  support  is  in-
creased, ‘‘the nation’s surface transportation programs must be fun-
damentally reformed.’’ 

Those  reforms  include:  Limiting  the  scope  of  programs  eligible 
for  Federal  assistance  to  those  having  a  true  national  interest; 
making  State  and  local  agencies  receiving  Federal  funds  account-
able for meeting performance objectives; reducing unnecessary and 
wasteful  project  delivery  requirements;  and,  requiring  that  major 
projects be subject to benefit-cost analysis. 

Regarding  safety,  which  is  extremely  important,  certainly  to  my 
company  and  to  the  industry  that  participates  as  a  major  user  of 
our  Nation’s  highway  system,  the  Commission  spent  considerable 
time developing the recommendations regarding safety—and again, 
that’s  a  subject  that’s  important  to  me  and  to  the  members  of  this 
Committee—and  specifically,  we  recommend  that  the  U.S.  Depart-
ment  of  Transportation  establish  national  safety  standards,  begin-
ning  with  an  ambitious  but  reachable  goal—as  Commissioner 
Heminger said—of cutting our fatalities in half from current levels 
by 2025. 

And  again,  the  Commission  recommends  performance  standards 
for  States  to  meet  in  order  to  ensure  that  this  recommendation  is 
not merely a headline but rather an achievable goal. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify today. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Quinn follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PATRICK E.  QUINN,  CO-CHAIRMAN AND PRESIDENT, 
U.S.  XPRESS ENTERPRISES,  INC.  AND COMMISSIONER,  NATIONAL SURFACE 
TRANSPORTATION POLICY AND REVENUE STUDY COMMISSION 
Good afternoon. My name is Pat Quinn and I am the Co-Chairman of U.S. Xpress 
Enterprises,  headquartered  in  Chattanooga,  Tennessee.  I  also  am  a  past  Chairman 
of  the  American  Trucking  Associations,  the  national  trade  association  of  the  truck-
ing  industry.  I  was  appointed  to  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and 
Revenue Study Commission by former Tennessee Senator Bill Frist. 

U.S.  Xpress  Enterprises  is  the  Nation’s  third-largest,  privately  owned  truckload 
carrier, with a fleet of 7,500 tractors and 22,000 trailers. U.S. Xpress provides dedi-
cated,  regional,  and  expedited  team  truckload  services  throughout  North  America, 
with  regional  capabilities  in  the  West,  Midwest,  and  Southeastern  United  States. 
The Company is one of the largest providers of expedited and time-definite services 
in  the  truckload  industry  and  is  a  leader  in  providing  expedited  intermodal  rail 
services. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  came  to  the  Infrastructure  Commission  with  the  goal  of  con-
vincing  my  fellow  Commissioners  of  the  need  for  a  new  national  transportation  vi-
sion  that  put  a  priority  on  a  freight  system  that  would  serve  the  needs  of  the  Na-
tion’s  economy.  That  vision  would  include  a  strong  Federal  role  today  and  con-
tinuing over the next 25 to 50 years. I was pleased to discover they didn’t need any 
convincing.  Even  more  importantly  as  we  scheduled  hearings  around  the  country 
and heard testimony from a wide range of interested parties, we found out the pub-
lic didn’t need any convincing. This may well be a case where the public is far ahead 
of  the  policy-makers  in  understanding  that  our  ability  to  move  goods  efficiently, 
safely and in a timely manner needs to be a national priority. 

In addition to the Commission’s recommendations regarding freight movement as 
a  national  priority,  I  also  would  like  to  briefly  comment  on  several  other  rec-
ommendations. 
Financing 

The  Commission  report  reasserts  the  long-standing  Federal  policy  of  user  financ-
ing.  Specifically,  the  report  states  that,  ‘‘personal  and  commercial  travelers  should 
pay  for  the  transportation  systems  and  services  they  use  in  proportion  to  the  costs 
associated  with  their  use.’’  Furthermore,  the  Commission  report  acknowledges  that 
the  primary  funding  source  for  highway  infrastructure  needs  should  remain  the 
Federal fuel tax, both on gasoline and diesel fuel. And while the Commission report 
recognizes  that  alternatives  to  the  tax  may  be  necessary  in  15  to  20  years,  it  also 
points out that the fuel tax has the following key attributes: low administrative and 
compliance  costs;  ability  to  generate  substantial  amounts  of  revenue;  relative  sta-
bility  and  predictability;  and  ease  of  implementation.  I  believe  those  principles 
should  be  the  benchmark  against  which  Congress  evaluates  future  alternatives  to 
the fuel tax. 

Equally  important,  the  Commission  report  recommends  that  Congress  needs  to 
enact  strict  criteria  and  conditions  for  the  approval  of  any  new  tolling  or  privatiza-
tion  initiatives  in  order  to  ensure  that  the  public  interest  is  protected.  From  the 
trucking  industry’s  perspective,  the  allure  of  privatization  of  our  Nation’s  highway 
infrastructure runs counter to the very needs of interstate commerce and a national 
highway network. 
Reform of the Program 

One of the most important recommendations of the Commission centers on the re-
lationship between the need for additional revenues and reform of the program. The 
Commission  report  states  that,  ‘‘simply  raising  the  Federal  fuel  tax  and  putting 
more money into the same programs will not be acceptable.’’ The Commission report 
clearly  states  that  before  any  Federal  financial  support  is  increased,  ‘‘the  Nation’s 
surface transportation programs must be fundamentally reformed.’’ 

a true national interest. 

Those reforms include: 
• Limiting  the  scope  of  programs  eligible  for  Federal  assistance  to  those  having 
• Making  State  and  local  agencies  receiving  Federal  funds  accountable  for  meet-
• Reducing unnecessary and wasteful project delivery requirements. 
• Requiring that major projects be subject to benefit-cost analysis. 

ing performance objectives. 

Safety 

The  Commission  spent  considerable  time  developing  its  recommendations  regard-
ing  safety,  a  subject  that  is  very  important  to  the  membership  of  this  Committee. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Specifically, the Commission recommends that the USDOT establish national safety 
standards,  beginning  with  an  ambitious  but  reachable  goal  to  cut  surface  transpor-
tation fatalities in half from current levels by 2025. And again, the Commission rec-
ommends performance standards for states to meet in order to ensure that this rec-
ommendation is not merely a headline but rather an achievable goal. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  today.  I  look  forward  to  answering  any 

questions you may have. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Now,  for  those  of  you  who  missed  my  announcement  earlier, 
Steve  Heminger  has  to  catch  a  flight,  and  he  has  to  leave  here  in 
about 10 minutes. So, if you all have any questions specific to him, 
let’s go ahead and ask. 

I’ll  ask  one,  and  I’m  going  to  ask  the  same  question  to  others 
after  you  leave.  My  question  for  you,  Mr.  Heminger,  to  start  out, 
is  a  question  that  was  in  the  news  last  week.  There’s  been  a  pro-
posal  that’s  floated  out  there  on  having  a  holiday  on  the  gas  tax. 
And  my  question  for  you  is,  what  impact  would  that  have  on  you, 
if we did a gas tax holiday? 

Mr. HEMINGER. Mr. Chairman, obviously, a lot of us work in the 
transportation  field,  and  so  one  impact  that  comes  immediately  to 
mind is it would result in a substantial reduction available to take 
care  of  our  infrastructure.  This  is  at  a  time  when  the  Highway 
Trust Fund is already about to enter a negative balance condition, 
so  I  can’t  imagine  a  worse  time  to  suggest  removing  additional  re-
sources from that fund. 

I  also  would  speculate,  perhaps,  that  if  the  intended  effect  is  to 
provide some price relief to consumers, that will be up to the people 
who set the prices. And I think it’s entirely plausible that the con-
sumers would not really see any relief. 

The one way I look at this, Mr. Chairman, and I’m not an econo-
mist, but when the Federal gas tax was last increased, it was 1993. 
In  1993,  the  average  retail  price  of  gas  in  the  United  States  was 
a dollar, and now it’s pushing $3.50. In my town of San Francisco, 
it’s  pushing  $4.00.  The  tax  hasn’t  caused  the  price  to  go  up.  There 
are a lot of other factors that have caused the price to go up. 

And over that time, that $2.00 increase in price has not resulted 
in  a  single  improvement  to  our  infrastructure  system.  And  I  think 
that’s  a  crying  shame.  The  place  where  we  have  relied  up  to  now 
to finance our infrastructure system—the place where we built the 
interstate system—for the last 15 years, has essentially been inac-
tive, and all of the revenues that have been generated through that 
price  rise  have  gone  other  places.  They’ve  gone  abroad—they’ve 
gone into plenty of things, everything, in fact, except improving the 
infrastructure for the people paying those fees. 

So,  while  we  understand  that  our  recommendations  in  the  area 
of  the  fuel  tax  and  taxation  are  some  strong  medicine,  one  thing 
about the fuel tax is that if it does lead to a higher price, the peo-
ple paying that higher price get a benefit for it—they receive some-
thing  in  return.  And  I  think  one  reason  that  there  is  obviously  a 
lot  of  concern  in  the  country  and  the  Congress  about  high  fuel 
prices, is we’re not getting anything for the high rate. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Yes, sir? 
Senator  SMITH.  Yes,  Mr.  Heminger,  you  mentioned  that  Aus-

tralia and Great Britain, I believe—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

Mr. HEMINGER. Yes, sir. 
Senator  SMITH.—have  reduced  their  fatalities.  How  did  they  do 

it? What can we do to emulate that? 

Mr. HEMINGER. A lot of it, Senator, has to do with driver behav-
ior, and I acknowledge that this is some of the more sensitive areas 
for legislation and regulation, but the fact is, if you look around the 
United  States,  half  of  the  States  don’t  have  a  primary  seat  belt 
law,  half  of  them  don’t  have  motorcycle  helmet  laws.  Only  a  few 
of them have ignition interlock laws, which prevent a drunk driver 
from driving drunk. 

That’s really where Great Britain, Australia, a number of the Eu-
ropean  nations  have  pushed  aggressively.  They’ve  passed  tough 
laws, and they have enforced them, rigorously, and they have driv-
en down fatality rates, significantly. 

In  the  field  they  talk  about  the  three  E’s—you  know,  Education, 
Enforcement  and  Engineering—and  we’ve  done  pretty  good  on  the 
first and the third, it’s the enforcement part that we’ve had trouble 
with,  because  it  does  mean,  sort  of  getting  in  the  face  of  motorists 
out  there  who  aren’t  obeying  the  laws,  or  who  are  driving  reck-
lessly. 

Senator SMITH. So, it isn’t an infrastructure thing, it’s education, 

enforcement—— 

Mr. HEMINGER. Look, part of it has to do with the fact that we’ve 
got  a  big  network.  And  we  do  have  a  lot  of  fatalities  occur  off  of 
the interstate, on rural roads where there’s a lot of engineering so-
lutions  that  could  be  enacted.  But  a  significant  fraction  of  the 
40,000 people dying every year are as a result of still, not wearing 
seatbelts,  drunk  driving,  and  the  like.  And  that’s  where  I  think 
there is a lot of ground to be gained, here in the United States. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Senator PRYOR. Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  to  get  somewhere  else 
here  in  just  a  minute,  too,  but  if  I  could,  I’ll  pose  this  question  to 
Mr.  Heminger,  and  then  if  the  others  would  answer  it  for  the 
record, that would be great, too. 

But, I’m just interested in kind of getting an overall sense of, you 
know,  you  obviously  have  studied  these  issues  very  closely  over  a 
long  period  of  time,  and  there  are  some  out  there  who  have  sug-
gested  that  the  Federal  Government  ought  to  reduce  its  role  when 
it  comes  to  our  Nation’s  transportation  system,  and  the  way  that 
we invest in it, and what-not. And I guess I’m just wondering what 
you  think  would  happen  if  the  Federal  Government  did  just  that? 
I  mean,  if  there’s  a  lot  of  talk  about  going  to  more  toll  roads,  and 
that  sort  of  thing,  just  kind  of  your  overall  impressions  and  re-
sponse to that question? 

Mr. HEMINGER. Senator, I think the short answer for most, if not 
all,  of  us  here  on  the  panel  today—but  certainly  the  9  members  of 
the  Commission  that  signed  the  report—is  that  there  is  no  sub-
stitute for Federal leadership. Federal leadership is what built the 
interstate system—we would not have an interstate system without 
Federal  leadership.  We  would  not  have  as  robust  a  public  transit 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

network—which  is  not  robust  enough—but  we  would  not  have 
what we’ve got without Federal leadership and support. 

We  really  see  no  substitute—the  Federal  program,  historically 
has provided about 40 percent of the capital funding. And while we 
endorse the notion of greater private sector involvement under rea-
sonable  conditions  that  protect  the  public  interest,  we  don’t  think 
the private sector is going to replace 40 percent of the capital fund-
ing, which is what the Federal Government provides today. 

We  don’t  think  it  makes  sense  that  we  should  take  the  Federal 
program  and  shove  it  down  to  the  States  and  pretend  that  that 
somehow  creates  more  money—it  doesn’t.  In  fact,  in  many  places, 
it may create less funding, because a number of States restrict the 
ability  to  use  gas  tax  funds  on  public  transit,  as  an  example.  So 
there  would  be  many  places  where  public  transit  would  see  a  re-
duction in funding, if there were some kind of turn-back or devolu-
tion of the tax rate. 

So,  we  believe,  essentially,  that  the  current  system  under  which 
private, local, State and Federal Governments all play a role, needs 
to  continue,  and  that  the  Federal  Government  needs  to  lead  the 
way. 

Senator  THUNE.  Mr.  Chairman,  that’s  really  the  only  question  I 
have,  but  I  just  wanted  to  thank  the  Commission  for  your  good 
work, and for your recommendations. And we obviously are looking 
very intently at some of those. We have a big problem in this coun-
try, we’ve got a big challenge ahead of us, we have a huge backlog 
of  transportation  needs,  and  those  are  going  to  have  to  be  ad-
dressed.  Whatever  your  mode  of  transportation  is  right  now,  we’ve 
got lots of capacity issues, I think, facing us in the future that are 
going  to  require  a  significant  investment.  And  the  question  is  how 
can we best accomplish that. 

And  there  are  some  of  us  who  have  introduced  some  different 
ideas, I think some of us are going to have to think outside the box, 
Senator  Wyden  and  I  have  a  Build  America  Bonds  Program  that 
we would like to have considered, as well, I think that was a little 
bit  outside  the  purview  of  what  you  were  doing,  but  that’s  some-
thing that we think makes some sense in terms of getting some ad-
ditional  dollars  into  our  infrastructure  across  this  country,  but  in 
order  for  us  to  be  competitive  globally,  we’ve  got  to  figure  out  how 
to solve this problem, and address it. 

Because  it  is  key  to  our  competitiveness,  and  I  think  people  in 
this country have an expectation that this is something the govern-
ment  has  a  role  with.  And  when  it  comes  to  infrastructure  we’ve 
got to step up and do what needs to be done. 

So, thank you again for your good work. 
And thank you, Mr. Chairman for holding this hearing. 
Senator PRYOR. You bet. 
Listen,  thank  you  Mr.  Heminger,  I  know  you  need  to  slip  out, 

and safe travels. 

Let me go ahead and ask you, Mr. Schenendorf, what I asked in 
my first question, and that is, again, last week there was some dis-
cussion  about  a  gas  tax  holiday.  What  impact  would  that  have  on 
you? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Mr. SCHENENDORF. Well, I would say that I agree with Commis-
sioner Heminger’s assessment. I think that there is, first, no guar-
antee  that  any  of  that  money  is  going  to  actually  flow  to  the  user. 
But  even  more  importantly,  I  mean,  I  think  it  sends  the  wrong 
signal  to  the  public.  We  need,  if  anything,  to  spend  more  on  our 
infrastructure, and American’s will benefit much—to a much great-
er degree if we’re able to repair our roads, provide the capacity we 
need  so  that  we  can,  basically,  reduce  congestion  and  make  sure 
that  we’re  economically  competitive  throughout  the  world,  that  we 
need  to  invest  more—and  suspending  taxes  just  sends  the  wrong 
signal, in my judgment. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Busalacchi? 
Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Well,  Senator,  my  opinion  on  this  is  probably 
a  little  bit  stronger  than  Jack’s  in  that  there  is  no  easy  fix  to  the 
problem  that  we  have  in  this  country.  The  problem  that  we  have 
with  transportation  in  this  country  is  very  complex.  Having  a 
short-term  reduction  of  the  gas  tax  is  certainly  not  the  solution  to 
the problem. 

We have a major issue with funding. We’re asking for a huge in-
crease  to  the  Highway  Trust  Fund  on  an  annual  basis  because  of 
a number of complex issues. I don’t believe that any kind of short- 
term fix that reduces the amount of dollars going into the Highway 
Trust Fund is going to solve the larger issues. 

The decisions that are going to need to be made by Congress will 
be  difficult.  At  the  same  time,  as  Commissioner  Rose  said  earlier, 
we’re going to have 120 million more people by the year 2050. 

So  we  just  don’t  have  the  issue  of  failing  infrastructure;  we’re 
also going to need to accommodate more people. How are we going 
to  compete  in  the  world?  It  is  a  ruse  to  suggest  that  for  3  months 
or 4 months reduce the gas tax, and that will fix the problem. 

The  American  people  have  to  understand  that  what’s  going  on 
here is very serious. We have to look at it that way. I’m not trying 
to get on a stump here. This is a serious issue for the country and 
I  think  it’s  short-sighted  to  think  that  reducing  that  tax  for  3 
months is going to solve the problem. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr. Rose, did you have any comments on the gas tax holiday? 
Mr.  ROSE.  No,  I’d  just  add—I  think  that  one  thing  we  need  to, 
at least what I read in—when I read the papers, was that the pro-
posal  was  to  take  money  out  of  the  General  Fund  to  put  into  the 
Highway Trust Fund, it wasn’t to deplete the Highway Trust Fund. 
So,  I’d  just  like  to  add  that  as  a  little  bit  of  an  add-on  to—to  this 
issue. 

And  I,  again,  I  think  it’s  hard  to  know  whether  or  not  the  price 
of  oil  would  come  down  by  the  18.5  cents  a  gallon.  I  really  viewed 
the whole concept more of a stimulus to get more money in people’s 
pockets,  but  I  think  the—it  was  clear  that  money  would  not  be 
taken out of the Trust Fund, it would be brought in from the Gen-
eral Fund. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Quinn? 
Mr.  QUINN.  Well  obviously,  you  know,  fuel  for  the  trucking  in-
dustry has almost become the highest cost, and for some companies 
it  is  higher  than  labor,  it’s  always  been  traditionally  the  second 
highest cost. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

And I just read a report late last week that said in the first quar-
ter  more  than  900  trucking  companies  went  out  of  business,  most 
of  them  small  firms.  Obviously,  you  know,  created  probably—pri-
marily by the cost of fuel. But I, you know, certainly companies are 
hurting  and  it  could  be  helpful  to  some  companies,  but  I—without 
more  information  as  to  how  this  might  actually  play  out  and  re-
duce,  you  know,  the  cost  at  the  pump  for  the  users,  I’m  not  sure. 
And  again,  it’s  a,  you  know,  a  3-month  situation.  We  really  need 
more long-term solutions as to how to deal with this, I think, than 
a 3-month situation. 

Senator PRYOR. All right. Let me follow up on that, if I may, with 
the entire panel, then I’ll let Senator Smith ask some questions. I’d 
like to address the VMT, the Vehicle Miles Traveled. 

Based  on  some  of  the  data  that  you’ve  showed  us  and  have  dis-
cussed, we see what’s happened. What has the Commission decided 
or what did you discuss and what would you recommend, given the 
changing marketplace for vehicles today? Hybrids, plug-in electrics, 
and  other  type  of  vehicles,  including  ones  that  use  ethanol,  are 
coming on board that don’t use any, or not much—traditional gaso-
line and diesel. What did you all talk about that? 

Mr. SCHENENDORF. We recognize that that is an issue, and in the 
long  term,  we  recommended  taking  all  of  the  prudent  steps  today 
to  try  to  move  toward  a  VMT-related  fee  or  tax  as  quickly  as  we 
can  get  there.  There  are  still  some  substantial  hurdles  to  being 
able  to  implement  that  kind  of  technology,  privacy  issues,  evasion 
issues, administration issues, and, but nevertheless though, we rec-
ommended  research,  pilot  projects  in  an  effort  to  move  as  quickly 
in that direction as possible. 

We do think that that’s going to take a number of years, and we 
agree  with  the  TRB  study  that  this  is  probably  10,  15,  20  years 
away. And in that interim period that we’re going to need to—and 
we’re  going  to  be  able  to—rely  on  the  gas  tax,  but  we  did  rec-
ommend trying to move toward a VMT-related fee as quickly as we 
can,  with  some  TRB  further  studies  and  pilot  projects  in  order  to 
try and hasten that transition. 
Senator PRYOR. Anyone else? 
Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Yes,  Senator,  I  was  able  to  go  to  Oregon  and 
the University actually took me through their pilot program. It’s a 
very  interesting  program,  and  I  think  they  did  a  great  job.  The 
Commission  recommended  a  short-term  and  long-term  solution  to 
our  revenue  issue.  I  believe  that  the  VMT  solution  is  more  long- 
term, several years down the road. 

As  Jack  had  said,  we  have  issues  with  privacy  associated  with 
the VMT concept. I do believe that, in the long-term, it’s something 
that  we  need  to  seriously  consider.  This  is  a  program  that  we  can 
use, that could be successful, and respects the user pay principle— 
the  people  who  use  the  system  will  pay  for  the  system.  I  think 
that’s everybody’s goal. 

I was very impressed by what Oregon is doing; it shows there is 

an approach out there that works. 
Senator PRYOR. Senator Smith? 
Senator SMITH. That’s a good lead-in. 
You know, it was very interesting that this—this test, this mile-
age  fee  concept  and  the  road-user  fee  pilot  program  that  Oregon 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

authorized.  I  was  very  interested  to  learn  that  they  believe  the 
technology exists to make it work, and that 91 percent of those in-
volved  in  it  said  they  would  prefer  it  to  the  gas  tax.  I’m  neither 
endorsing  it  or  denouncing  it,  I’m  just  curious  if  you  think  that 
that  may  be  a  more  equitable  way  to  bear  this  future  capital  in-
vestment that we have ahead of us as a country. 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  It  certainly,  if  all  of  the  problems  can  be 
overcome, it certainly has the potential to be that way, because you 
can  then  engage  in  different  kinds  of  pricing,  depending  on  the 
time—time  of  day,  which  particular  road  system  you’re  on.  So  I 
think  it  does  have  a  lot  of  potential,  and  I  think,  you  know,  we 
think our report moves as quickly as possible in that direction, rec-
ognizing it’s still going to take some time to perfect it. And to turn 
over  the  fleets,  because  you  have  to  have  an  entire  fleet  outfitted 
with the equipment that would be needed to—— 
Senator SMITH. We’d need a transition period. 
Mr. SCHENENDORF. —right. 
Senator  SMITH.  Mr.  Schenendorf,  you  mentioned  that  if  we  did 
the  gas  tax  holiday  this  summer  that  it  wouldn’t  get  to  the  con-
sumer. Is that—I assume you’re concluding that—at least I believe 
that’s  what  you  said—that  the  companies  would  just  pocket  that. 
Is that your—is that your conclusion? 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  I  think  there’s  a  good  possibility  that  that 
would be the case. And I think we don’t know for sure what would 
happen  if  the—because  you  don’t  actually  pay  at  the  gas  pump. 
Those fees are paid much higher up the chain, and whether or not 
the  prices  would  actually  reflect  the  suspension  of  the  18.4  cents, 
I think is a question. So, it’s—that I’m not sure that the consumer 
would actually see the full amount. 

Senator  SMITH.  There’d  certainly  be  a  lot  of  political  pressure  to 

make sure that the consumer did see it, I imagine. 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  Right,  but  there’s  so  much  fluctuation  in  the 
price  of  gasoline,  I  think  it  would  be  very  hard  to  be  able  to  abso-
lutely ascertain, yes, it was passed through or no it wasn’t. 

Senator SMITH. Fair enough, thank you. 
Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Senator  Smith,  I  think  the  other  thing  to  re-
member  is  that  from  the  point  of  view  of  a  DOT  person,  a  system 
like  this  can  really  provide  us  a  lot  of  data  on  a  regular  basis,  be-
cause  we  would  know  what  roads  people  are  using  and  how  much 
they’re using them. This information would be very helpful to each 
individual State if you’re able to track, not just the miles traveled, 
but the roads being used. A system like this, really has a lot of po-
tential. 

Senator  SMITH.  If  you  examined  the  program  at  the  University 
of  Oregon,  did  they  make  a  distinction  between  urban  miles  trav-
eled versus rural miles traveled and account differently for that in 
term of cost? 

Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  In  the  Oregon  pilot  there  were  only  two  or 
three gasoline stations that the drivers used. I think that all of this 
type of information could be included in a VMT. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  that  is  really  the  question  I  would  have,  if 
somebody from Pendleton, Oregon where there’s a lot of, as I said, 
a lot of dirt between light bulbs—it just seems to me that in rural 
economies,  where  the  economies  frankly  are  much  poorer  than  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

urban  places,  and  the  miles  they  have  to  travel  with  farm  goods 
and things like that are much greater, they would be disproportion-
ately  disadvantaged,  and  there  would  have  to  be  some  kind  of  an 
adjustment  between  urban  and  rural  in  order  to  just  simply  make 
it fair, and to raise the revenues necessary. 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  I  think  the  system,  you  know,  when  people 
talk about the VMT fee and the future and what it might look like, 
I  think  it’s  meant  to  be  designed  in  a  way  that  would  allow  that 
exact  type  of  thing  to  be  done,  where  you  really  could  tailor  the 
charges to the kind of road, the kinds activities, and we have rural 
areas  that  have  very  light  flow  on  it  that  would  be  at  a  much,  po-
tentially,  lower  rate  than  in  urban  areas  where  you’ve  got  a  lot  of 
congestion  and  it’s  a  much  higher  price  for  use  of  those  facilities. 
Senator  SMITH.  The  reason  that  that’s  important,  and  a  lot  of 
times folks in urban areas don’t understand this, they feel like the 
rural areas are getting some big deal because we invest dispropor-
tionately  a  lot  more  concrete  and  asphalt  in  rural  places.  But  for 
every  40  wheat  farmers  in  Pendleton,  there  are  thousands  of  jobs 
directly  related  in  Portland,  Oregon,  an  urban  place,  to  haul  in 
their wheat, and the getting it out to the world markets. So, there 
really  is  a  need  to  enhance  understanding  of  the  interconnected-
ness and the mutual need between urban and rural people. 

Thank you. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me  ask  another  question,  if  I  may.  Thank 
you,  Senator  Smith,  appreciate  you  attending.  I  know  this  is  one 
of  the  matters  you  discussed  multiple  times  at  the  Commission 
level,  and  I  understand  there’s  a  minority  view  on  this  topic  as 
well,  and  that  is  the  question  of  tolling.  Who  wants  to  explain  to 
the Committee the nature of your discussions on tolling and where 
the sides were on that, and then what the Commission actually de-
cided? Who wants to do that? 

Mr. SCHENENDORF. I can take a first stab at it—— 
Senator SMITH. Sure. 
Mr.  SCHENENDORF.—if  you’d  like.  On  the  question  of  tolling  and 
pricing and public-private partnerships, which really means private 
tolling  and  private  pricing,  the  difference  of  opinion,  I  think,  was 
really  one  of  degree.  I  think  all  of  the  Commissioners  felt  that 
those are financing tools that we’re going to need to take advantage 
of as we try to build the transportation system for the 21st century. 
The difference was, I think, that the dissenters viewed that real-
ly as almost the total solution, they were, you know, their basic po-
sition  was  that  there  ought  to  be  devolution,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment should basically reduce its commitment, therefore they didn’t, 
the use of a gas tax or a freight fee or everything was not an issue 
because  the  Federal  Government  wouldn’t  be  part  of  the  solution, 
and  therefore,  the  way  that  the  system  would  then  be  financed 
would be through tolling and private sector. 

I  think  the  majority  of  the  Commissioners’  view  was  that  we 
needed  to  have  a  continuation  of  public  funding  being  a  big  piece 
of the solution and the Federal Government provide the leadership, 
being  a  full  partner,  but  that  tolling  and  public-private  partner-
ships and pricing were still going to be necessary to make the sys-
tem  work  and  were  going  to  play  an  important  part,  just  not  the 
whole solution. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Senator,  I  think  in  the  Commission  report,  we 
left  it  up  to  the  individual  States,  whether  or  not  they  wanted  to 
embark  on  public-private  partnerships  and  tolling  and  things  like 
that. It’s a State decision, quite frankly. If you use my State as an 
example,  we’ve  made  a  policy  decision  that  we  don’t  want  toll 
roads, period. We don’t think they’re helpful. We think they punish 
people  who  have  already  paid  for  these  roads.  A  large  part  of  the 
commerce that flows in and out of our State is by truck; we’re cog-
nizant of the fact that the truckers would be affected as well. 

We  feel  that  in  our  State  in  particular  tolling  is  problematical. 
But having said that, tolling could be a solution for some states. 
It’s not the total solution, in fact, it’s a very, very small part of the 
tools that need to be in the revenue options toolbox. 

Senator PRYOR. And Mr. Quinn, you look like you wanted to add 

something to the tolling discussion. 

Mr.  QUINN.  Well,  obviously  to  the  trucking  industry,  tolling  is  a 
very  serious  issue,  but  I  think  the  Commission  rightfully  decided 
that  the  tolling  of  existing  interstates,  that  have  been  built  and 
paid for with the current taxing structure, did not make sense. On 
new  construction  or  new  roads  where  you’re  given  an  option  and 
it’s not mandated, that may make sense and can be—again, as the 
other  Commissioner  said,  it’s  part  of  a  solution,  it’s  part  of  a  tool, 
it’s  not—there  is  no  ‘‘the  answer’’  for  the  problems  and  the  financ-
ing  that’s  necessary.  But  tolling  of  new  construction  may  be  help-
ful,  HOV  lanes,  you  know,  hot  lanes,  things  like  that  that  can  be, 
that perhaps can be helpful on new construction. We would be sup-
portive of that. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Let  me  ask,  if  I  may,  Mr.  Rose,  about  freight  fees.  In  your  testi-
mony  or  in  something  I  read,  you  talked  about  freight  fees  and  a 
national fee may be the best way to go about assessing the freight 
fees.  I  think  the  Committee  would  have  several  questions  about 
how  that  would  work,  such  as,  who  pays  the  fee,  who  collects  the 
fee, et cetera. Could you elaborate on your thoughts on freight fees 
and then what the Commission concluded on the issue? 

Mr.  ROSE.  Sure,  Senator.  Right  now,  at  the  major  trade  ports, 
there’s  a  lot  of  individual  municipalities,  cities,  States,  all  consid-
ering  freight  fees.  Just  in  the  San  Pedro  Port  of  Los  Angeles/Long 
Beach,  you’ve  got  an  hours  of  the  day  fee,  they’re  going  to  a  new 
truck  fee,  they’re  going  to  a,  potentially,  a  labor  fee,  they’re  going 
to  a—building  a  new  terminal,  they’re  going  to  do  a  fee  with  that. 
I mean, we’ve got the Alameda Corridor fee. 

And so, you know, one of the things about our commerce system, 
why there is a national need, is that if we allow people to tax com-
merce  and  tax  transportation,  we  will  end  up,  quite  frankly,  with 
a  very  disjointed  economic  reality.  So  what  will  happen  is  that 
freight will move around, thus causing more infrastructure require-
ments  in  areas  that  may  or  may  not  be  the  most  efficient  route. 
The  purpose  of  having,  again,  federally  preempted,  is  for  that 
reason.  As  far  as  having  a  common  collection  point,  you  can  imag-
ine  if—if  one  of  our  customers  was  having  to  pay  five  or  six  dif-
ferent  fees  on  a  single  load  of  freight,  as  well  as—the  last  thing  I 
think  that  we  want  to  do  is  incentivize  freight  movements  to  go 
through  other  parts  of  the  North  American  continent,  i.e.,  Mexico 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

or  Canada,  only  then  to  come  into  a  different  port  of  entry  that 
would  not  have  the  same  level  playing  field,  if  you  will,  on  a  fee 
coming through a—or a load coming through a port. 

So,  what’s  really  important  to  customers,  shippers,  retailers, 
those  people  who  are  paying  the  freight  bill,  is  that,  again,  there’s 
transparency  and  that  these  fees  go  to  the  actual  transportation. 
The  best  example  of  this  is  the  Alameda  corridor  out  in  the  Los 
Angeles area, where we built a 20 mile trench, if you will, $2.5 bil-
lion, and we have an assessment of around $18, it’s inflated a little 
bit,  $18  per  20-foot  equivalent,  for  every  box  that  comes  through 
those,  an  $18  fee  gets  applied  to  it.  And  we  didn’t  hear,  quite 
frankly,  any  complaints  against  shippers—from  shippers  because 
everybody was able to see the $2.5 billion. 

What  we  see  with  some  fees  though,  and  the  same  thing  that  I 
think  Pat  was  referring  to,  in  terms  of  tolling,  when  those  fees  or 
those  tolls  go  off  the  actual  physical  facility  and  go  off  to  solve 
other  problems,  then,  quite  frankly  and  rightfully  so,  I  believe, 
shippers  feel  like  that  they’re—that  they’re  being  mistreated  and 
that they don’t believe that those fees are going to remediate trans-
portation-type issues. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Let  me  ask  another  question,  and  I’m  not  sure  who  this  should 
go  to,  but  let  me  try  with  Mr.  Busalacchi  and  see  if  this  is  some-
thing he would like to comment on, or if one of the other Commis-
sioners should respond. 

I  know  in  the  discussions  we’ve  already  had,  the  concept  of  per-
formance standards has come up. I am interested to know how the 
Commission  envisions  performance  standards  working  and  what 
that really means. Are we looking at doing formulas, based on pop-
ulation or road usage? So, who’s the best one to answer that? 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  What  we  envisioned,  all  ten  of  the  programs 
we  envision  as  performance-based  programs,  and  if  they  were  en-
acted  the  way  we  envision  them,  by  the  Congress,  the  first  step 
would be for the Federal Government and the States and the stake-
holders to work out the metrics for each of these standards, so that 
you would have a measurable national metric for what it means to 
be in a state of good repair, or how we’re going to measure conges-
tion, or freight movement, depending on the particular program. 

Once  you  had  those  standards  then  agreed  to,  each  State  would 
go out and would measure what they had to do and develop a plan 
for bringing their infrastructure into a state of good repair or what 
it’s going to take in order—in that metropolitan area to reduce con-
gestion  by  20  percent,  and  what  kinds  of  investment  they  would 
have to make, and they would cost that out. 

They  would  provide  a  cost  estimate,  just  the  way  the  interstate 
system  had  a  cost  estimate  for  what  it  was  going  to  cost  to  meet 
that  performance  standard.  And  then,  nationally,  you  could  use 
those  costs  to  make—to  distribute  the  funding  so  that  each  State 
would get its relative share of what it needed to meet the perform-
ance  standard.  You  would  also  know  nationally  how  much  money 
you had to put into the program to achieve the performance stand-
ard over a certain number of years. 

And  so  that  as  you  funded  that  over  time,  you  would  basically 
have  all  the  States  progressing  toward  meeting  the  performance 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

standard over some period of time. That’s precisely the model that 
was  used  for  the  interstate  system,  with  cost  estimates,  and  the 
interstate system was ultimately completed using that approach. 

So,  the  model  is  the  interstate  system  program,  the  actual 
metrics  for  the  standards  would  be  developed  in  a  collaborative 
process,  at  the  outset,  by  the  Federal  Government,  States,  and 
stakeholders. 

Senator PRYOR. My sense on that is that’s certainly an idea that 
we ought to talk about and discuss and see if we can find the right 
pathway to performance standards. But, the House and Senate will 
have some concerns about that program being set up appropriately 
and  taking  all  the  miscellaneous  circumstances  into  account.  I  al-
ready  know  how  colleagues  can  justify  how  money  is  currently 
being  spent.  But  I  do  think  it’s  a  worthy  idea  to  consider  and  if  it 
works  out  and  that’s  the  direction  we  want  to  go,  great.  I  want  to 
thank the Commission for putting that on the table for discussion. 
I  don’t  remember  which  one  of  you  in  your  opening  statements 
mentioned the idea of Department of Transportation consolidation. 
I  think  there  are  108  different  Federal  agencies  and  the  Commis-
sion  recommends  that  somehow  they  be  condensed.  I’m  not  sure  if 
the  recommendation  is  to  condense  that  into  ten  programs  or  just 
sort  of  ten  umbrellas,  under  which  108  agencies  fit.  I’m  not  quite 
sure  what  the  best  route  is  for  consolidating.  Why  does  the  Com-
mission think those need to be consolidated? I can understand why 
without hearing it, but I’d like to hear your thoughts and what the 
rationale was there. And then, when you end up with these ten, do 
you  have  the  structure  and  the  specifics  in  mind  already?  Do  you 
have that blueprint done, or are we just talking concepts here? 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  I—it  was  my  statement.  We  basically  are 
suggesting  is  that—we’re  proposing  these  10  performance-based 
programs as a replacement for the existing programs. And the rea-
son  that  we’ve  done  that  is,  when  you  have  108  funding  streams 
and 108 priorities, you really don’t have any priorities. 

And  so  what  we  have  tried  to  do  is  to  say  the  Federal  Govern-
ment needs to refocus its program, it needs to have a sense of mis-
sion, and we defined that mission as these 10 programs, a program 
for  state  of  good  repair,  a  program  to  reduce  congestion  in  major 
metropolitan  areas,  Commissioner  Rose  talked  about  the  National 
Freight  Program.  So  those  are  the  10  programs—a  safety  pro-
gram—and those programs would reflect the Federal priorities, and 
then  they  would  operate  the  way  we  just  talked  about,  in  devel-
oping the performance standards. 

Senator  PRYOR.  So,  if  I  can  pick  on  two  specific  programs  today, 
FMCSA  and  NHTSA,  might  those  both  go  in  the  safety  program? 
Mr. SCHENENDORF. Those would be—those missions would be en-

compassed in the safety program. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  What  about  if  programs  really  have  split 
missions,  would  you  break  up  that  some  how  and  reconfigure  that 
in some way? 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  Yes,  it  would  depend  obviously  on  the—on 
the  particular  program,  but  we  think  that  the  10  performance- 
based  programs  that  we’re  recommending  really  cover  all  of  the 
current missions in the 108, but just in a much more focused way, 
and  in  a  way  that  ultimately  the  public  will  be  better  able  to  un-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

derstand  what  the  mission  and  States  and  local  governments  are 
going  to  have  to  come  up  with  plans  and  programs  that  actually 
accomplish  the  transportation  objectives  laid  out  in  those  10  per-
formance-based programs. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. I also noticed in the commission’s report and 
findings,  the  idea  of  a  National  Surface  Transportation  Commis-
sion, which might be modeled after something they do at the Postal 
Service,  and  maybe  even  the  BRAC.  The  idea  would  be  to  try  to 
depoliticize the allocation of resources, is that fair? 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  I  think  it  was  meant  to  try  to  depoliticize 
some  of  the  more  controversial  things,  really  in  raising  the  reve-
nues that would be necessary in setting the funding levels, and like 
the Postal Rate Commission, the purpose of this Commission would 
not  be  to  duplicate  what  DOT  does  in  any  fashion,  but  instead, 
would be there to oversee it and the basically say, ‘‘OK, this is the 
program Congress set out, here’s how much it’s going to cost, here’s 
the  level  of  taxes  that  you’ll  need,’’  and  then  have  Congress  vote 
up or down on the level of revenue that would be necessary for the 
program  that  Congress  put  in  place,  and  obviously  Congress  can 
change those requirements. 

But  it  was  supposed  to  be  a  helpful  thing  to  kind  of  depoliticize 
what has been a very difficult political decision in raising the fund-
ing. 

Senator PRYOR. So, just to walk me through that a little bit, the 
Commission’s  thought  is  that  the  Congress,  and  the  President  of 
course,  would  authorize  a  Commission  that  I  think  we  call 
NASTRAC, to find and structure revenue sources and also have the 
ability to raise that revenue, in other words, to increase the gas tax 
or whatever the case may be. Is that correct? 

Mr. SCHENENDORF. Not exactly, I mean, I think what they would 
do is kind of oversee the DOT process. And we talked before about 
these  cost  estimates  that  would  come  up.  Each  of  these  programs 
would  basically  have  a  cost  associated  with  them,  what  it’s  going 
to  take,  and  then  what  they  would  do  is  they  would  compile  all 
those  and  say,  ‘‘You  know,  in  order  to  do  what  Congress  has  laid 
out in the statute over the next 15 years, it’s going to take X billion 
dollars  per  year  of  investment  in  all  of  these  programs,  and  that 
would  mean  that  the  Federal  gas  tax,  if  that’s  what  Congress  has 
said is going to be the funding source, would have to be raised, let’s 
say, by, you know, four cents a gallon.’’ 

And  then  that  four  cents  a  gallon—they  wouldn’t  actually  raise 
it by four cents a gallon, but they would send it to Congress as the 
recommendation  that  it  be  raised  by  four  cents  a  gallon,  and  then 
Congress  would  have  to  vote  on  that,  just  the  way  they  vote  on 
postal  rate  increases.  It  would  be  an  up  or  down  vote.  Congress 
would  make  the  final  decisions,  but  this  would  be  put  in  front  of 
them  as  saying  here’s  what  it’s  going  to  cost  to  do  what  Congress 
laid out in the statute. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  I  notice  all  your  colleagues  here  love  to 
allow  you  to  talk.  You  guys  can  chime  in  on  this  if  you  want  to. 
But,  let  me  ask  another  question  that  is  again  part  of  your  rec-
ommendations  and  part  of  the  discussions  that  you  had,  and  that 
is  congestion  relief  and  metropolitan  mobility—those  are  very  im-
portant  things,  obviously.  But  I  think  the  way  you  have  it  struc-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

tured,  you  focused  on  communities  of  a  million  or  more  in  popu-
lation. 

For example, you mentioned the Northwest Arkansas corridor, in 
which  the  old  Highway  71  traverses.  By  the  way,  when  I  was  in 
college  and  law  school,  Highway  71  was  so  dangerous  and  so  bad, 
so  hard  to  drive,  I  actually  used  to  take  a  road  home  called  ‘‘the 
Pig  Trail.’’  So,  you  can  imagine  how  bad  that  one  was.  Compared 
to 71, though, I thought it was preferable. 

Nonetheless, the northwest part of our state is growing really ex-
ponentially—in  the  last  10  or  20  years  it  has  really  taken  off,  it’s 
one  of  the  fastest  growing  areas  in  the  country—but  they  have  a 
lot  of  congestion  issues.  They’re  far  outgrowing  and  outpacing  the 
infrastructure  that  we  currently  have  there.  Every  time  I  go  up 
there, I’ll be stopped at a traffic light, and somebody will make me 
roll  down  the  window,  and  say,  ‘‘Hey,  when  are  we  going  to  get 
some more roads up here?’’ 

But  that  area  doesn’t  have  a  million  people.  So,  what  about  an 
area that isn’t at the million threshold, but is growing rapidly, and 
for whatever reason, needs some help on its infrastructure—how do 
you contemplate fixing it? 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  We  really  have,  of  the  10  programs,  two  are 
really complementary to each other. One is the Metropolitan Mobil-
ity of a Million or More, the other is the Rural and Smaller Cities. 
So,  for  all  the  areas  not  covered  by  the  Million  or  More—because 
we  thought  those  were  a  special  set  of  problems,  that  those  areas 
of a million or more, it really needed a targeted, and somewhat dif-
ferent  program,  the  rest  of  the  State  and  smaller  communities 
would be eligible under the other program, and that program itself 
would  have  congestion  standards  with  respect  to  both  access  and 
mobility  in  those  areas.  And  so  they  would  get  funding,  as  well, 
through the second program. 

Senator PRYOR. I promise you every question I ask isn’t going to 
be  about  Arkansas,  but  just  as  an  example—and  I  know  if  other 
Senators were here they would have examples in their States, too— 
I’m  not  trying  to  make  this  Arkansas-centric,  one  of  the  10  pro-
grams  that  you  have,  is  called  the  Connecting  America  Through  a 
National Access Program. 

And,  for  example,  in  our  State—and  again,  I  know  other  States, 
if  other  Senators  were  here  they  could  tell  specifics  from  their 
State—but in my State, we have a planned, but far from completed 
project.  In  many  areas,  in  most  areas  there’s  been  almost  no  work 
done  on  it,  at  all,  except  for  just  a  general  planning.  For  example, 
Interstate 49, which would go down the western state border of Ar-
kansas  due  north  and  south,  very  close  to  Oklahoma.  And  I–69, 
which would come through mostly in Mississippi, and then clip the 
southern  quadrant  of  our  State,  and  go  through  a  little  corner  of 
our State and then go on down into Louisiana. 

Those  are  two  interstates  that  have  not  yet  been  built,  they’ve 
been  on  the  map  and  on  the  blackboard  for  a  long  time,  but,  we 
as a Nation, have never built them. Is that the way you envision— 
this Connecting America Program? 

Mr. SCHENENDORF. Those kind of corridors—and there are many 
of  them,  throughout  the  country  that  need  to  be  upgraded  to  four- 
lane,  divided,  interstate-type  roads—would  really,  potentially,  be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

funded  under  two  of  the  10  programs—one  is  the  one  that  you 
mentioned, the Rural Access, providing access to all parts of Amer-
ica, and tying all parts of America together, so that’s one place. 

But  also  on  the  freight—National  Freight  Program—some  of 
those  routes  are  going  to  be  part  of  the  corridors  that  need  to  be 
upgraded for freight movement throughout the country, so some of 
those  corridors  could  be  upgraded  through  that  program,  as  well. 
So, you’ve got those two major programs that would be able to pro-
vide funding for those kinds of corridors. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Let  me  go  back,  if  I  may,  to  one  of  your  previous  answers  when 
I asked earlier about minority views. Not all of the Commissioners 
signed  the  report—I  forgot,  how  many  Commissioners  were  there, 
total? Twelve? 

Mr. SCHENENDORF. Twelve. 
Senator PRYOR. And what, all but 2 or 3 signed? 
Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  Nine  Commissioners  approved  the  report,  3 
dissented,  of  the  9  that  approved  it,  5  were  appointed  by  Repub-
licans,  4  by  Democrats,  includes  a  very  diverse  group  from  a  very 
diverse political spectrum, all signed the report, supporting it. 

Senator  PRYOR.  I  don’t  want  to  say  one  person  is  more  valuable 
than the next—but maybe the most significant name or position in 
the  dissenting  group  is  the  current  Secretary  of  Transportation, 
Mary Peters. 

As  I  understand,  her  viewpoint,  and  the  reason  she  didn’t  sign 
the report—and you all tell me if I’m wrong, but—as I understand 
it,  is  because  she  felt  like  the  funding  mechanism  was  too  Federal 
tax-centric, is that fair to say? 

Mr. SCHENENDORF. Well, I think the main difference was the role 
of  the  Federal  Government,  that  basically,  Secretary  Peters  and 
the  other  dissenters  were  arguing  for  a  much  diminished  Federal 
role, that there wouldn’t be any increase in funding at the Federal 
level,  that  the  Federal  mission  would  be  more  confined  to,  really, 
maybe  just  the  interstate  program,  that  they’re  not—wasn’t  the 
need  for  Federal  assistance  to  transit  or  intercity  passenger  rail, 
and  that  all  of  those  improvements  were  really  the  responsibility 
of State and local governments and the private sector. 

So,  it  was  really  that  role  of  the  Federal  Government  that  was 

the real distinction between the majority and the minority. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Anybody  have  anything  to  add  on  that?  On  the 

dissenting view? 

Mr.  ROSE.  I  just,  from  my  perspective,  we  were  in  agreement  on 
a  lot  more  things  than  we  were  in  disagreement  on.  And  it  really 
came down to how best to collect, and where the primary responsi-
bility—but  an  awful  lot  of  the  programs,  from  performance  stand-
ards,  to  a  lot  of  the  various  program  reductions,  we  were  all  in 
agreement upon. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And,  Mr.  Rose,  was  this  a  healthy  process  for 
you to go through? Did you think this process was good for the sys-
tem? 

Mr.  ROSE.  I  think  it  is.  What  I  believe  one  of  our  roles  was,  to 
give you a, at least a blueprint of some ideas, as you all debate and 
discuss  the  next  funding.  We  hope  that  you  will  constantly  be 
thumbing through the book and the suggestions, and at least know 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

that  for  2  years,  12  people  spent  a  lot  of  time,  going  around  the 
country, listening to a lot of various organizations’ constituents. 

And while, at the end of the day, we really do believe that we’ve 
got  a  world-class  transportation  system,  we  know  that,  if  you  sub-
scribe  to,  our  economy  is  going  to  continue  to  grow,  and  that  our 
population is going to continue to grow, we think we’ve got a really 
big issue coming toward us. 

And  we  hope  that—if  nothing  else—that  you’ll  take  a  lot  of  the 
work that’s been done, and reference it, as you all go through your 
various  processes  to  design  the  future  transportation  network  for 
our country. 

Senator PRYOR. Let me ask, if I may, while I have you, Mr. Rose, 
on this railroad tax credit? You all talk about that, and I know that 
Senator Lott, when he was here, had a tax credit idea and a bill— 
could  you  elaborate  what  the  Commission  talked  about,  when  it 
came to the tax credit? 

Mr.  ROSE.  Sure.  The—I  think  the  real  debate  was  around  that 
we  need  more  freight  rail  capacity.  And  as  we  looked  at  our  study 
the  first  time,  again,  that  these—the  entire  Class  I  network  has 
never  been  modeled,  if  you  will,  as  one  U.S.  railroad  network,  be-
cause these are privately held companies that all interconnect with 
each other. 

But  the  study  revealed  that  we’re  going  to  have  to  spend  about 
$140 billion through the year 2035. And even though the railroads 
are spending at record capital right now, we think that there’s still 
going  to  be  a  gap  there.  And  I  believe  that  the  most  efficient,  and 
the most rational way to do this, is through tax stimulus. 

And  the  reason  we  believe  that—and  the  reason  I  believe  it—is 
that what we try to design in this program is a program that would 
simply  stimulate  investment  to  come  sooner  rather  than  later,  but 
not  so  much  of  a  stimulus  that  it  would  ever  stimulate  non-eco-
nomic investment to be made. 

And  the  other  thing  we  made—that  we  were  clear  about—this 
isn’t  just  for  railroads.  We  have  a  lot  of  customers  that,  quite 
frankly,  want  to  build  rail  storage  capacity,  rail  expansion  capac-
ity—in some cases—— 

Senator PRYOR. And some of this deals with coal? 
Mr. ROSE. Right.—it could be rail—it could be coal-storage yards. 
You  know,  we  believe  that  there  are  customers  that  want  to  build 
out  to  another  railroad,  that  would  be  used  for  this  expansion  ca-
pacity. 

So  let’s  say,  it’s  the  25  percent  off  of  expansion  capacity  only— 
so it’s not for the maintenance and renewals of the ties and the bal-
last  resurfacing  that  we  do—and  we  believe  that  it  would  have  a 
net-net very positive impact to get more rail capacity for our coun-
try. 

Senator PRYOR. Good. 
Before  I  let  you  all  go,  because  many  of  our  colleagues  went  to 
that  Tom  Daschle  portrait  unveiling,  they  left  me  with  a  lot  of 
questions here, and that’s why I’m asking all of the questions. 

But, I do have one question, as we leave, and I don’t know who’s 
best  to  try  to  handle  this,  but  you  all  talk  about  taking  these  108 
programs  and  consolidating  them  down  into  10—does  that  also 
mean,  and  I’m  not  sure  the  report  speaks  to  this  directly—does 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

that  also  mean  that  the  entire  Department  of  Transportation 
should  be  reconfigured,  and  reorganized,  and  re-done  to  meet  the 
challenges that they have today? 

Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  Well,  I  think  that  it  wouldn’t  be  essential  to 
do that, but I don’t think that we think that that would be the next 
logical  step.  And  I  think  we  did  recommend  that  at  some  point, 
once  you  consolidate  these  programs  into  performance-based,  mod-
ally  neutral  programs,  than  it  would  make  sense  that  the  Depart-
ment  of  Transportation  restructure  the  Department  in  a  way  that 
was  more  compatible  with  the  performance-based  programs.  But 
certainly,  it  wouldn’t  be  essential  to  do  that,  you  could  take  the 
first step of doing the performance-based. 

Senator PRYOR. Great. 
Did you all have anything else before I adjourn the hearing? Any 

other comments? 

Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  I  would  just  like  to  reaffirm  a  couple  of  things 
that  I  had  said  in  my  testimony  about  inter-city  passenger  rail. 
This is a very important piece of the Commission report. It’s some-
thing  that  I  believe  very  strongly  that  the  country  wants  and 
needs. States have to have a Federal partner. States cannot expand 
inter-city rail without a Federal partner. 

I  believe  that  if  we  do  it,  and  we  expand  our  rail  network,  and 
we  do  it  as  the  Commission  report  recommends,  focusing  on  con-
gested city-to-city pairs of 500 miles or less, we can help ourselves 
with energy independence, and global warming. It’s something that 
we can do, but we’re running low on time. 

I know the Senator, before she left, had mentioned that we didn’t 
say  anything  about  Amtrak.  Commissioners  recognized  that  Am-
trak—at  the  end  of  the  day,  may  not  be  the  only  provider.  I  feel 
very  strongly  that  we  have  to  reauthorize  Amtrak,  and  give  them 
the money they need. We really need a Federal commitment, here, 
like the commitment we’ve made to highways and airports. 

Thank you. 
Senator PRYOR. You bet. 
Anybody else before we adjourn? 
Mr.  QUINN.  Mr.  Chairman,  just  a  couple  of  things.  You  know, 
transportation  is  so  important  to  our  Nation’s  economy—between 
the  rail  industry  and  the  trucking  industry—you  know,  we  move 
the Nation’s economy. 

And  the  freight  bottlenecks,  the  congestion  that  we’re  seeing  on 
the  highways  today  are  costing  billions  of  dollars  a  year.  If  we 
could transform, correct those situations, that actually frees money 
up, you know, for other development construction. 

And  they’re  becoming  more  critical  every  day  as  more  and  more 
vehicles  are  on  our  roads,  and  if  the  economy  is  going  to  grow,  we 
simply  have  to  solve  these  problems,  immediately.  It’s  a  crisis  out 
there  today,  and  it’s  a  crisis  that  grows  bigger  every  day.  And  if 
you  take  Matt’s—his  2  percent  a  year,  and  look  what  that  does, 
compounded, this has to be addressed now, because it’s costing us. 
The  failure  to  act  is  what’s  going  to  cost  us  billions  more  dollars. 
It  costs  billions  now,  but  the  failure  to  do  anything  is  going  to  be 
much more expensive than what we have to do. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr. QUINN. Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

Senator PRYOR. Well, thank you. 
And let me just say this and—I’m sorry, did you? 
Mr.  SCHENENDORF.  Well,  I  just  wanted  to  add  at  the  end  here, 
on  behalf  of  all  of  the  Commissioners,  thank  you  for  having  us  up 
here and giving us this opportunity, and we stand ready to help in 
any way we can as you proceed forward. 

Senator PRYOR. Well, thank you. 
That’s really what I was going to say, is that I want you to know 
that your work is not in vain, and we are going to start the process 
here at some point in the next several weeks. It will be up to Sen-
ator  Inouye  and  Senator  Stevens  on  how  we  proceed  in  the  Com-
mittee. 

But  we’re  going  to  start  that  process  of  looking  at  our  future 
highway  needs,  and  getting  prepared  for  the  next  highway  bill, 
when that comes up, and your work, and all of your time and effort 
and  energy  will  really  be  a  starting  point  for  discussion  in  a  lot  of 
areas. 

I  think  your  work  has  been  valuable,  and  it’s  very  much  appre-
ciated. We will leave the Committee record open for 2 weeks, we’ll 
allow Senators who could not be here—or like Senator Stevens, had 
to leave early—to submit their questions for the record, so don’t be 
surprised if the staff contacts you all, and asks you to get those re-
sponses back to us, but this is very important. 

And it’s like you said, our transportation system moves the econ-
omy, and it literally does. If we want to have that economic growth, 
like  you  all  talked  about,  we  have  to  have  the  right  kind  of  trans-
portation  infrastructure  there  to  make  it  happen,  and  to  allow  it 
to happen. 

So, again, I want to thank you on behalf of the entire Committee, 
certainly  Senator  Inouye,  Senator  Lautenberg,  Senator  Stevens, 
Senator Hutchison, want to thank you all very, very much for being 
here,  and  all  your  time,  and  if  there’s  anything  else  you’d  like  to 
submit  for  the  record  like  more  charts,  please  don’t  hesitate  to  do 
that,  we  look  forward  to  working  with  you  over  the  next  several 
months. 

The hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 4:22 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

JACK SCHENENDORF 

Question  1.  The  Commission  recommends  a  consolidation  of  the  Federal  surface 
transportation  programs  into  10  new  program  areas.  One  of  those  programs  area 
is  a  safety  program.  How  should  this  safety  program  be  financed—by  the  users  of 
the system? 

Answer.  The  Commission  applauds  the  Federal  Government’s  work  over  the  past 
four  decades  to  improve  transportation  safety.  There  is  no  doubt  that  our  Nation’s 
surface  transportation  systems  are  much  safer  than  they  were  in  the  early  1970s, 
thanks to cooperative efforts between the Federal Government, State and local part-
ners, research institutions, and the private sector. 

Much  work,  however,  needs  to  be  done,  which  is  why  the  Commission’s  final  re-
port recommends more ambitious national safety standards and a goal to cut surface 
transportation fatalities in half from current levels by 2025. To accomplish this, the 
Commission  recommends  a  National  Safe  Mobility  Program.  Like  the  other  pro-
grams envisioned under a restructured surface transportation strategy, the Commis-
sion’s final report recommends funding the National Safe Mobility Program through 
user  fees.  These  user  fees  would  come  from  the  Highway  Trust  Fund—or  its  suc-
cessor,  a  Surface  Transportation  Trust  Fund—that  includes  revenue  from  a  variety 
of sources, including fuel taxes. 

The  fatalities  and  injuries  created  by  unsafe  transportation  impact  many  aspects 
of  society  at  large,  including  public  health,  family  welfare,  and  the  economy.  There 
is justification in having transportation users pay the cost for safety programs. 

Question  2.  The  Commission  also  recommends  creating  a  National  Freight  Pro-
gram.  Does  the  Commission  recommend  levying  a  waybill  tax?  Who  does  the  Com-
mission believe would be best to administer a waybill tax? Should these funds avail-
able  for  port-related  infrastructure  that  feeds  into  the  surface  system,  as  currently 
there is no Federal program to financing port improvements? 

Answer.  Given  the  strong  Federal  interest  in  freight  movement,  the  Commission 
recommended  that  Congress  should  make  available  a  variety  of  funding  sources  to 
meet the needs of a freight transportation program which addresses chokepoints at 
major  gateways  and  trade  corridors.  The  freight  program  envisions  port-side  im-
provements,  if  they  are  part  of  comprehensive  freight  planning  and  yield  the  in-
tended  benefit  of  improving  freight  flow  across  the  Nation’s  freight  transportation 
networks. 

At the Federal level, the Commission envisioned a variety of funding mechanisms, 
including increased gas tax revenues, tax credits, a portion of Customs duties reve-
nues and a Federal freight fee. With regard to a Federal freight fee, the Commission 
reviewed  a  variety  of  fee  options,  including  a  freight  waybill  charge.  It  did  not 
render  a  judgment  on  what  type  of  specific  fee  would  be  the  best  to  implement  to 
help fund freight projects. 

Throughout the deliberations of a fee, there was discussion of the fact that inter-
national  trade  is  a  ‘‘game  changer’’  for  freight  flows,  which  informed  the  Commis-
sion’s  judgment  that  generating  revenues  from  trade-related  means  is  appropriate. 
Thus,  the  Commission  focused  on  diverting  a  portion  of  Customs  fees  to  freight 
projects.  This  approach  has  the  advantage  of  an  existing  mechanism  for  collection 
and  is  a  reasonable  proxy  for  trade  volumes  flowing  through  freight  networks  and 
chokepoints.  The  Commission  noted  that  if  5  percent  of  Customs  duties  were  dedi-
cated to freight transportation improvements, revenues would be approximately $1.8 
billion per year. 

With  regard  to  a  container  fee,  the  Commission  noted  that  a  container  fee  para-
digm has in the past served to fund the public’s share of public-private partnerships 
to develop needed freight infrastructure. The Alameda Corridor is the best example 
of  this  model.  However,  the  Commission  was  careful  to  caution  Congress  that  any 
such  fee  should  be  undertaken  only  with  the  creation  of  an  accountable  and  trans-

(53) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

parent programmatic linkage between any assessed fee and the selection of projects 
that  facilitate  increasing  volumes  of  primarily  trade-driven  freight.  The  payers  of 
such a fee must realize the benefit of improved freight flows resulting from projects 
funded  by  the  freight  program.  Such  a  fee  should  be  designed  to  ensure  that  com-
merce  is  not  burdened  by  local  and  State  proliferation  of  such  fees;  no  mode  of 
transportation  or  port  of  entry  is  disadvantaged  and  that  the  ultimate  consumer 
bears the cost (i.e., carriers do not assess, the government does, so that the cost can-
not be borne by a carrier). 

The Commission noted that private freight rail investment is the most significant 
source  of  investment  in  the  freight  network  and  that  such  investment  would  fall 
short of demand, despite current and projected record levels of infrastructure spend-
ing.  Thus,  the  Commission  recommended  an  investment  tax  credit  to  pull  forward 
additional  private  investment  and  counseled  against  proposals  that  would  reduce 
private  freight  railroad  investment.  A  variety  of  witnesses  before  the  Commission 
presented  convincing  arguments  that  this  would  include  not  only  regulatory 
changes, but also increased taxes and fees on carriers. 

Question 3. The Federal Highway Administration has estimated that large trucks 
do not pay their full cost in fuel taxes related to their use of and impact on Federal 
highways.  Does  the  Commission  recommend  ensuring  that  all  users  fully  pay  their 
associated costs? 

Answer. The Commission recognized that increasing the fuel tax without commen-
surate  changes  in  truck  taxes  could  exacerbate  the  current  situation  where  heavy 
trucks  pay  less  than  their  share  of  highway  costs.  Therefore,  the  Commission  rec-
ommended that when adjusting Federal fuel tax rates, tax rates on existing Federal 
truck  taxes  should  be  adjusted  proportionally  to  maintain  the  current  allocation  of 
highway cost responsibility. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:40 Jul 24, 2012 Jkt 052754 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75167.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

